Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies and tracking technologies
We use cookies to understand and save users’ preferences for future visits and compile aggregate data about site traffic and site interactions in order to offer better site experiences and tools in the future. We also use trusted third-party services that track this information on our behalf. By clicking ‘Accept All’, you consent to the use of all cookies and tracking technologies. To learn more about our use of cookies, view our
Cookie Notice
.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Calendly
8
Learn more about this provider
__cfruid
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
_calendly_session
If consent is given by the visitor, this cookie allows the website to add events into the visitor's calendar.
referrer_user_id
Necessary for the website's booking functionality.
rc::a
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
rc::c
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots.
_ab
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
_mf
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
id
Pending
FormAssembly
11
Learn more about this provider
AWSALB [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBCORS [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBTG [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBTGCORS [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
FORMASSEMBLY [x2]
Used to implement and maintain form settings on the website.
simpleStorage
Preserves the visitor's session state across page requests.
Goconsensus
1
Learn more about this provider
csrf-token
Ensures visitor browsing-security by preventing cross-site request forgery. This cookie is essential for the security of the website and visitor.
Google
1
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
ar_debug
Checks whether a technical debugger-cookie is present.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
li_gc
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Microsoft
1
Learn more about this provider
__RequestVerificationToken
Helps prevent Cross-Site Request Forgery (CSRF) attacks.
Stripe
3
Learn more about this provider
__stripe_mid
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
__stripe_sid
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
m
Determines the device used to access the website. This allows the website to be formatted accordingly.
calendly.com
pages.syndigo.com
syndigo.com
vimeo.com
4
__cf_bm [x4]
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
calendly.com
vimeo.com
zoominfo.com
3
_cfuvid [x3]
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
cdn.cookielaw.org
1
OptanonConsent
Determines whether the visitor has accepted the cookie consent box. This ensures that the cookie consent box will not be presented again upon re-entry.
global.localizecdn.com
5
ljs-cache
Version number of the currently cached translation dictionary
ljs-hide
Whether or not localize.js is active on the page
target-lang
Hepls identifiying target language.
wBUMa5sXF0SkDen
Helps translate your Website
wBUMa5sXF0SkDsettings
Helps translate your Website
pages.syndigo.com
1
BIGipServer#
Used to distribute traffic to the website on several servers in order to optimise response times.
pages.syndigo.com
consent.cookiebot.com
2
CookieConsent [x2]
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
syndigo.com
2
loadedLang
To determine the currently selected language of the webpage.
wpEmojiSettingsSupports
This cookie is part of a bundle of cookies which serve the purpose of content delivery and presentation. The cookies keep the correct state of font, blog/picture sliders, color themes and other website settings.
ws.zoominfo.com
1
visitorId
Preserves users states across page requests.
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
Bizible
1
Learn more about this provider
_biz_flagsA
This cookie serves multiple purposes; it determines whether the user has submitted any forms, performed cross-domain migration or has made any tracking opt-out choices.
Calendly
11
Learn more about this provider
sprigReplay#chunkUploads
Tracks user interaction with Calendly for analysis and improvement.
sprigReplay#events
Tracks user interaction with Calendly for analysis and improvement.
sprigReplay#pendingCaptures
Tracks user interaction with Calendly for analysis and improvement.
_pendo_guides_blocked.4cfbcefc-fcf9-4b66-5dc6-9b0d81bb07a9
Used to avoid guide errors when Pendo detects that a visitor has an ad blocker enabled.
_pendo_meta.01234567-89ab-cdef-0123-456789abcdef
This stores a hash of the current metadata so that Pendo can see when it is changed and update it. If disabled, metadata events may be sent too frequently to the point where Pendo may have complications tracking when metadata changes happen.
_pendo_visitorId.4cfbcefc-fcf9-4b66-5dc6-9b0d81bb07a9
This is used to identify and record the visitor information so the information is used in Pendo analytics and Guide delivery.  If disabled, VisitorID is central to all analytics and Guide delivery. The visitorID will not be recorded on any Guide events (i.e. dismiss, advanced, or in segmentation) or usage data until the user has been identified again
pendo_sessionLastUserInteractionEvent
This is used to identify and record the visitor’s account ID that will be used in Pendo like Guide delivery and analytics. If disabled, the account ID will not be recorded with events or xhr events until the user has been identified again. This could cause issues with analytics and Guide delivery.
previous_page_loads
Monitors user navigation patterns and manage session lifecycles effectively.
sprig.anon.env.vid.map
Tracks user interactions for analysis and improvement.
data/guide.gif/#-#-#-#-#
Pending
1
This cookie is used in conjunction with the payment window - The cookie is necessary for making secure transactions on the website.
Drift
5
Learn more about this provider
DRIFT_openTabs
Used to make the chat function consistent across tabs, if the user has multiple browser tabs open for the same website.
DRIFT_SESSION_ID
Allows the website to recoqnise the visitor, in order to optimize the chat-box functionality.
DRIFT_SESSION_STARTED
Stores a unique ID string for each chat-box session. This allows the website-support to see previous issues and reconnect with the previous supporter.
DRIFT_visitCounts
Determines the number of visits of the specific visitor. This is used in order to make the chat-box function more relevant.
driftt_aid
Necessary for the functionality of the website's chat-box function.
Microsoft
3
Learn more about this provider
MuidSyncDomain
Pending
MuidSyncTimestamp
Pending
FormsWebSessionId
The cookie is used if the visitor has filled in personal information on a formula. This information will be filled in automatically on other formulas. This process is used to optimize visitor experience.
Vimeo
2
Learn more about this provider
player
Saves the user's preferences when playing embedded videos from Vimeo.
sync_active
Contains data on visitor's video-content preferences - This allows the website to remember parameters such as preferred volume or video quality. The service is provided by Vimeo.com.
YouTube
1
Learn more about this provider
yt.innertube::nextId
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
global.localizecdn.com
3
ljs-lang
Currently selected language of the page
ljs-source-lang
Source language ID of the page
pageIsDisabled
Page is disabled from multi language translation.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Calendly
4
Learn more about this provider
pendo_cd
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
ajs_anonymous_id
This cookie is used to count how many times a website has been visited by different visitors - this is done by assigning the visitor an ID, so the visitor does not get registered twice.
userleap.ids
This cookie is set to make split-tests on the website, which optimizes the website's relevance towards the visitor – the cookie can also be set to improve the visitor's experience on a website.
data/ptm.gif/4cfbcefc-fcf9-4b66-5dc6-9b0d81bb07a9
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
Google
3
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_ga
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
_ga_#
Used by Google Analytics to collect data on the number of times a user has visited the website as well as dates for the first and most recent visit.
_gcl_ls
Pending
Microsoft
1
Learn more about this provider
c.gif
Collects data on the user’s navigation and behavior on the website. This is used to compile statistical reports and heatmaps for the website owner.
Segment
1
Learn more about this provider
ajs_anonymous_id
This cookie is used to identify a specific visitor - this information is used to identify the number of specific visitors on a website.
Vimeo
2
Learn more about this provider
_dd_s
Registers the website's speed and performance. This function can be used in context with statistics and load-balancing.
vuid
Collects data on the user's visits to the website, such as which pages have been read.
assets.calendly.com
player.vimeo.com
2
dd_cookie_test_# [x2]
Registers data on visitors' website-behaviour. This is used for internal analysis and website optimization.
global.localizecdn.com
1
ljs-visits
Number of pageviews
ws.zoominfo.com
2
ziwsSession
Collects statistics on the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
ziwsSessionId
Collects statistics on the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
3
Learn more about this provider
lastExternalReferrer
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
lastExternalReferrerTime
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
_fbp
Used by Facebook to deliver a series of advertisement products such as real time bidding from third party advertisers.
Appnexus
1
Learn more about this provider
receive-cookie-deprecation
Collects information on user behaviour on multiple websites. This information is used in order to optimize the relevance of advertisement on the website.
Bizible
7
Learn more about this provider
_BUID
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
ipv
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_dfsA
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_kvpA
Collects data on user visits to the website, such as what pages have been accessed. The registered data is used to categorise the user's interest and demographic profiles in terms of resales for targeted marketing.
_biz_nA
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_pendingA
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_uid
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
Calendly
3
Learn more about this provider
pendo_tabId
Collects data on the user across websites - This data is used to make advertisement more relevant.
ajs_group_id
Collects data on visitors. This information is used to assign visitors into segments, making website advertisement more efficient.
ajs_user_id
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
Drift
4
Learn more about this provider
DRIFT_NOTIFICATION_PLAYED
Pending
DRIFT_SESSION_CAMPAIGNS
Used to determine when and where certain pop-ups on the website should be presented for the user and remember whether the user has closed these, to keep them from showing multiple times.
drift_aid
Sets a unique ID for the specific user. This allows the website to target the user with relevant offers through its chat functionality.
drift_campaign_refresh
Sets a unique ID for the specific user. This allows the website to target the user with relevant offers through its chat functionality.
Google
5
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
IDE
Used by Google DoubleClick to register and report the website user's actions after viewing or clicking one of the advertiser's ads with the purpose of measuring the efficacy of an ad and to present targeted ads to the user.
test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
NID
Registers a unique ID that identifies a returning user's device. The ID is used for targeted ads.
pagead/1p-user-list/#
Tracks if the user has shown interest in specific products or events across multiple websites and detects how the user navigates between sites. This is used for measurement of advertisement efforts and facilitates payment of referral-fees between websites.
_gcl_au
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement efficiency across websites using their services.
LinkedIn
2
Learn more about this provider
bcookie
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
lidc
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
Microsoft
5
Learn more about this provider
MR [x2]
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
SRM_B
Tracks the user’s interaction with the website’s search-bar-function. This data can be used to present the user with relevant products or services.
ANONCHK
Registers data on visitors from multiple visits and on multiple websites. This information is used to measure the efficiency of advertisement on websites.
SM
Registers a unique ID that identifies the user's device during return visits across websites that use the same ad network. The ID is used to allow targeted ads.
Segment
3
Learn more about this provider
__tld__
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
ajs_group_id
This cookie is used to assign specific visitors into segments, this segmentation is based on visitor behavior on the website - the segmentation can be used to target larger groups.
ajs_user_id
This cookie is used to collect data on the visitor's behavior on the website - this information can be used to assign the visitor to a visitor segment, based on common preferences.
YouTube
12
Learn more about this provider
#-#
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
iU5q-!O9@$
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
LogsDatabaseV2:V#||LogsRequestsStore
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
nextId
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
requests
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
ServiceWorkerLogsDatabase#SWHealthLog
Necessary for the implementation and functionality of YouTube video-content on the website.
TESTCOOKIESENABLED
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Tries to estimate the users' bandwidth on pages with integrated YouTube videos.
YSC
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
YtIdbMeta#databases
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
b.6sc.co
1
v1/beacon/img.gif
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
bing.com
forms.cloud.microsoft
3
MUID [x3]
Used widely by Microsoft as a unique user ID. The cookie enables user tracking by synchronising the ID across many Microsoft domains.
j.6sc.co
4
_6senseCompanyDetails
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_an_uid
Presents the user with relevant content and advertisement. The service is provided by third-party advertisement hubs, which facilitate real-time bidding for advertisers.
_gd_session
Collects visitor data related to the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been loaded, with the purpose of displaying targeted ads.
_gd_visitor
Collects visitor data related to the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been loaded, with the purpose of displaying targeted ads.
syndigo.com
1
SyndigolastVisit
Pending
Unclassified
0
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
We do not use cookies of this type.
Cross-domain consent
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS_COUNT#]
[#BULK_CONSENT_TITLE#]
List of domains your consent applies to:
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS#]
Cookie declaration last updated on 2/27/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
A “cookie” is a small text file stored on your device that contains information about your device. Syndigo uses cookies to allow our website to operate, to increase its functionality and efficiency, to analyze how you use our website in order to improve it, and to tailor the content and information that we display to you (including targeted advertisements).
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of our website. For all other types of cookies, we need your consent. This website uses different types of cookies. To read more about the different types of cookies used by this website, please go to our cookie notice:
https://syndigo.com/legal/cookie-notice/
.
You can, at any time, change or withdraw your consent by either changing the settings in this cookie banner, or by contacting us using the information in the cookie notice. You can also alter the configuration of your browser to reject certain types of cookies by setting global privacy controls (GPC). For more information on GPC, please visit:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#download
. You may also set your browser to send a Do Not Track (DNT) signals. For more information on DNT, please visit
https://www.aboutcookies.org/
and
https://allaboutdnt.com/
.
If you want to understand how we process your personal data, please view our privacy notice:
https://syndigo.com/legal/privacy-policy/
Do not sell or share my personal information
Only strictly necessary
Accept selected
Customize
Accept all
Syndigo Privacy Notice
Last updated: Feb 18, 2025
Introduction
Syndigo LLC and any affiliate entity controlled directly or indirectly by it (collectively, “
Syndigo
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”) take the protection of your personal data (“
Personal Data
”) very seriously. Please read this Privacy Notice (the “
Notice
”) to learn what we’re doing with your Personal Data, how we protect it, and your privacy rights.
What Is Covered by this Privacy Notice?
This Notice is designed to assist you to understand how and why we process your Personal Data when:
You use our website, syndigo.com (“Website”).
You interact with us via our social media pages, or sign-up to our webinars.
We provide you with customer support services (“Services”).
You enroll in our Syndigo University training programs or other online training programs (“Training”).
You enquire about our products and Services, or you place a product order with us.
You respond to a survey or fill out any forms from us.
We sell or market our products and Services to you.
You provide services or products to us as our service provider or supplier.
We collect analytics and session replay data from your use of our products to understand usage patterns, improve usability, and identify issues, which helps us enhance our offerings.
Within the scope of this Notice, Syndigo is the business that makes the decisions about the processing of your Personal Data (also known as the “data controller” or “business”), unless expressly specified otherwise.
This Notice does not cover:
Information collected by our customers who use our products
: We host the data related to our customers’ clients for our customers (and for which we act as a “data processor” or “service provider”) via our product applications. The Personal Data submitted to us as a data processor or service provider, within Content Experience Suite (CES) is governed by the
Content Experience Suite Privacy Notice
. Refer to the applicable product notices for more information.
Information we collect about employees or job applicants
: If you are a Syndigo employee, read the Global Employee Privacy Notice on Syndigo’s shared drive. If you are a job applicant, please read our
Job Applicant Privacy Notice.
Information which does not constitute Personal Data
: If we do not maintain information in a manner that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could be reasonably linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular individual or household, such information is not considered Personal Data and this Notice will not apply to our processing of that information.
External websites or services
: Our Website and products may contain links to websites of third parties. We are not responsible for the handling of your Personal Data by those third parties and recommend that you review their privacy notices.
What Can You Find in This Notice?
This Notice tells you, among other things:
what Personal Data we process about you and how we obtain it
;
for what purposes we use that Personal Data;
how long we keep your Personal Data
;
with whom we share your Personal Data
;
the legal bases for processing your Personal Data
;
your rights about the Personal Data we collect about you
and how you can exercise those rights;
how we protect your Personal Data
; and
how to contact us
.
What Personal Data We Process and How We Obtain It
The table below describes the categories of Personal Data we have collected about you in the last twelve months.
Personal Data We Collect, Process, or Store
How We Obtain It
Identifiers
First and last name, email address, telephone number, Internet Protocol address, username, and password.
We collect this information when you create your account or log into our products, and use the Services.
We collect your IP address when you visit our Website.
You provide it to us when you make an enquiry about our products and Services, or otherwise communicate with us.
You provide it to us when you sign up to our webinars.
We obtain it from our third-party service providers that supply business-to-business sales databases and contacts to us.
Customers and Prospects Commercial Information
First and last name, email address, and telephone number, job title.
Our communication with customers and prospects (correspondence, call and video recordings, and transcriptions and analyses thereof), as well as any needs, preferences, attributes, and insights relevant to our potential engagement with prospects.
We collect this information when you provide it to us when you use our products and Services.
We collect this from you when you make enquiries, requests, and otherwise communicate with us.
We obtain it from our third-party service providers that conduct video recordings and transcriptions for us.
Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history, search history, information on your interaction with our Website, application, or advertisement, device screen size, device type, unique identifiers, browser information, geographic location (country).
We collect this information from your activity when you use our Website, applications, or social media pages.
We obtain this information from our third-party service providers who perform online analytics or online marketing for us.
Inferences drawn from other Personal Data
Profile reflecting your preferences, predispositions, behavior, attitudes.
We collect this information by analyzing the information that you have provided to us by entering it into our applications, or when you use our Website.
We will not collect additional categories of Personal Data without informing you.
We use cookies and other online tracking technologies on our Website and in our applications. To learn about Syndigo’s use of cookies on the Website, please read our
Cookie Notice
. To learn about Syndigo’s use of cookies in CES, read the
CES Cookie Notice
.
For What Purposes Do We Use Your Personal Data?
We process your Personal Data for the following purposes:
To ensure the security of the services (e.g. using IP addresses for monitoring unauthorized access and security incidents).
Monitoring platform usage trends across different regions, networks, and timeframes.
Detecting potential inefficiencies or high-traffic areas that could affect system performance.
Identifying users or companies who may be exceeding contractual limits on logins or usage.
Cross-referencing IP addresses with incoming requests to detect abuse of resources or bandwidth.
To enable your use and access of our products, applications, and Services.
To analyze your interactions with our products and applications to identify issues, optimize performance, and enhance both current and future features for a better overall user experience. This includes usage analytics and session replay data to create a limited reconstruction of your online activity. However, we employ privacy-enhancing techniques such as data minimization, masking, and anonymization where possible to reduce the collection of personal data and protect your privacy.
To improve our Services in order to better serve you.
To personalize your experience on our Website. We analyze your behavior on our Website (such as how much time you spend on which pages and which links you choose to click etc.) to improve the Website and better respond to you. We also use technology to translate certain English fields into other languages based on your preferences.
To respond to your requests or questions.
To receive product improvement feedback.
To administer contests, webinars, promotions, or surveys.
To process your transactions.
To develop and track sales leads.
To send periodic service emails to you regarding your orders or information related to the products and Services.
To personalize advertisements for you related to our products or Services.
To facilitate and optimize our sales operations.
To maintain the security and integrity of our Website, products, applications, databases, and business operations.
To address legal issues. This may include processing your Personal Data for us to comply with our obligations to retain certain business records for minimum retention periods; to establish, exercise, defend legal claims; to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, intellectual property infringements, or other violations of our contracts, or the law; to respond to lawful requests from law enforcement, national authorities, court orders.
To achieve the above purposes, we need to perform different types of processing activities on your Personal Data, such as storage, access, transmission, consultation, manipulation, and combination.
How Long We Keep Your Personal Data
When the purposes of processing are satisfied, we will delete the related Personal Data within thirty (30) days, or upon receipt of a verified request.
Automated Decision-Making
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making. There will always be human intervention into decisions based on automated processing, including automated analytics, testing, and profiling. If this position changes, or there is a need and lawful basis to do so, we will inform you.
Sharing Personal Data with Service Providers
We share your Personal Data with certain service providers who assist us in operating our Website, conducting our business, or servicing you. The categories of service providers to which we may disclose your Personal Data include:
Infrastructure services providers
Customer service providers
Internet service providers
Cloud service providers
Office tools providers
Payment processing providers
Customer survey providers
Email service providers
Email security services providers
Web analytics providers
Session replay and user interaction analytics providers
Enterprise open-source solutions providers
Project management tool providers
Application hosting service providers
Sales conversations intelligence providers
We enter into agreements with our service providers (also known as “processors”) to ensure that they keep your Personal Data confidential, only use it for the services they provide to Syndigo and treat your Personal Data with the same level of protection that we do.
Syndigo does not sell your Personal Data in the conventional sense (for money). Like many companies, however, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you or analyze our Website traffic and we share your Personal Data with these business partners for this purpose and their use. Making Personal Data (such as online identifiers or browsing activity) available to these companies is considered a “sale” under applicable data protection and privacy laws. If you would like to opt out of the sale of your Personal Data that take place via cookies and other online tracking technologies, you can learn how
below
in the Privacy Rights section of this Notice.
We may disclose your Personal Data to the extent required by law or if we have a good-faith belief that we need to disclose it to comply with official investigations or legal proceedings (whether initiated by governmental/law enforcement officials, or private parties). If we have to disclose your Personal Data to governmental/law enforcement officials, we may not be able to ensure that those officials will maintain the privacy and security of your Personal Data.
We may also disclose your Personal Data if we sell or transfer all or some of our company’s business interests, assets, or both, or in connection with a corporate restructuring. Finally, we may disclose your Personal Data to our subsidiaries or affiliates, but only if necessary for business purposes, as described in the section above.
We reserve the right to use, transfer, sell, and share aggregated, anonymous data for any legal purpose. Such data does not include any Personal Data. The purposes may include analyzing usage trends or seeking compatible advertisers, sponsors, and customers.
Where Do We Store and Transfer Your Personal Data To
Syndigo is headquartered in the United States of America (“
U.S.
”) and its data centers are primarily in the U.S. Syndigo also uses many U.S.-based services providers. This means that your Personal Data is primarily stored by us and our service providers in the U.S. However, we operate globally through our affiliates, subsidiaries, and services providers. This means that we may store and transfer your Personal Data to our affiliates, subsidiaries, and service providers who are in different countries if it is relevant for the delivery of our Services and products, or applicable for business operations.
Note if you are located in the EU
: Some of our service providers and affiliates are located outside of the European Union or the European Economic Area. In some cases, the European Commission may have determined the data protection laws of some countries provide a level of protection equivalent to European Union law. You can see
here
the list of countries that the European Commission has recognized as providing an adequate level of protection to Personal Data. We will only transfer your Personal Data to third parties in countries not recognized as providing an adequate level of protection to Personal Data when there are appropriate safeguards in place. These safeguards include the
European-Commission-approved standard contractual data protection clauses
under
Article 46.2 of the General Data Protection R
egulation (“
GDPR
”), the Data Privacy Framework (as defined below), or other approved mechanisms.
For individuals whose Personal Data is safeguarded by the Data Privacy Framework: Before sending your Personal Data to a third party, we will do one of two things:
Seek your consent; or
Demand privacy and security: We will ensure the third party maintains the same level of privacy and security for your data as we do. We are accountable or liable for the protection of your Personal Data when we transfer it to others except when we can prove that we are not responsible for an event that leads to any unauthorized or improper processing. We either send it to a country, territory or sector within a country that is recognized as providing the same level of Personal Data protection as the country of origin or the Data Privacy Framework, or use safeguards like the
Data Privacy Framework
or the
SCCs
with necessary adjustments for transfers from the UK or Switzerland, or use specific transfer instruments like the
UK International Data Transfer Agreement
.
We are accountable and liable for the protection of your Personal Data when we transfer it to others except when we can prove that we are not responsible for an event that leads to any unauthorized or improper processing.
Note if you are located in Brazil
: Some of these third parties may be located outside of Brazil. In some cases, the Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados (“
ANPD
”) may have determined that certain countries’ data protection laws provide an equivalent level of protection to the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“
LGPD
”). Where this is not the case, we will only transfer your Personal Data to third parties located in other countries when there are appropriate safeguards in place which the ANPD has confirmed as acceptable.
EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks, and the UK Extension
With respect to Personal Data processed in the scope of this Notice, Syndigo LLC complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (and its UK Extension) and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (the “Data Privacy Framework”) as adopted and put forward by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the processing of Personal Data. Syndigo LLC commits to upholding the Data Privacy Framework Principles. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Notice and the Data Privacy Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles shall govern.
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
U.S. Regulatory Oversight
Syndigo LLC is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission.
Dispute Resolution
Where a privacy complaint or dispute cannot be resolved through our internal processes, we have agreed to participate in the
VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure
. Subject to the terms of the VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure, VeraSafe will provide appropriate recourse free of charge to you. To file a complaint with VeraSafe and participate in the VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure, please submit the required information through the web form located here:
https://www.verasafe.com/privacy-services/dispute-resolution/submit-dispute/
.
If a complaint or dispute related to Personal Data cannot be resolved through Syndigo’s internal process, in addition to the VeraSafe Dispute Resolution Procedure, Syndigo has agreed to cooperate with the EU data protection authorities (“DPAs”), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (“FDPIC”), and to take part in the dispute resolution procedures of the panel established by such data protection authorities.
Binding Arbitration
If your dispute or complaint cannot be resolved by us, nor through the dispute resolution program established by VeraSafe or the dispute resolution procedures established by the DPAs, the ICO or the FDPIC, you may have the right to require that we enter into binding arbitration with you pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework’s “Recourse, Enforcement and Liability Principle” and Annex I of the Data Privacy Framework.
Risk of Harm
Whenever Personal Data is collected and processed, there is always a slight risk that the Personal Data may be breached, misused, or otherwise result in a harm to you. However, we take several measures to ensure that this risk is mitigated as much as possible. These measures include limiting the Personal Data about you that we collect and process to solely what is necessary, not collecting sensitive Personal Data about you, and implementing appropriate security measures, as described in this Notice.
Lawful Bases for Processing
The GDPR and other applicable data protection laws require that we have a valid reason to use your Personal Data. This is called the “lawful basis for processing.” When operating as a data controller, we may process your Personal Data:
Because you gave your consent.
Because we need to perform a contract with you.
Because we have a legitimate interest in processing your Personal Data and it is not overridden by your rights. Some of those interests include: (1) Identifying and preventing fraud; and (2) enhancing the security of our network and information systems.
Because we need to comply with the law.
On another ground, as required or permitted by law.
When we rely on legitimate interests as a lawful basis of processing, you have the right to ask us more about how we decided to choose this legal basis. To do so, please use the contact details provided
at the end of this Notice
.
Where we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you
may withdraw it at any time
. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of our processing before you withdrew your consent. It will also not affect the validity of our processing of Personal Data performed on other lawful grounds.
Where we receive your Personal Data as part of providing our Services to you based on a contract, we require such Personal Data to be able to carry out the contract. Without that necessary Personal Data, we will not be able to provide the Services to you.
What Privacy Rights Do You Have?
You have specific rights regarding your Personal Data collected and processed by us. Please note that you can only exercise these rights with respect to Personal Data that we process about you when we act as a data controller or as a “business”. To exercise your rights with respect to information processed by us on behalf of one of our customers, please read the privacy notice of that customer.
Syndigo acknowledges the right of EU, UK and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework and will grant individuals reasonable access to Personal Data we received pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework Principles. In addition, we will take reasonable steps to permit individuals to correct, amend, or delete such information that is demonstrated to be inaccurate or processed in violation of the Data Privacy Framework Principles. Additionally, if we have received your Personal Data in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework, you may also have the right to opt out of having your Personal Data shared with third parties and to revoke your consent to our sharing your Personal Data with third parties. You may also have the right to opt out if your Personal Data is used for any purpose that is materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected or which you originally authorized. An individual may request to access their Personal Data, or otherwise correct, amend, delete, withdraw their consent or limit the processing of their Personal Data in line with the Data Privacy Framework Principles by contacting us.
In this section, we first describe those rights and then we explain
how you can exercise those rights
.
Right to Know What Happens to Your Personal Data
This is called the right to be informed. It means that you have the right to obtain from us all information regarding our data processing activities that concern you, such as how we collect and use your Personal Data, how long we will keep it, and who it will be shared with, among other things.
We are informing you of how we process your Personal Data with this Notice.
Right to Know What Personal Data Syndigo Has About You
This is called the right of access. This right allows you to ask for full details of the Personal Data we hold about you.
You have the right to obtain from us confirmation as to whether or not we process Personal Data concerning you, and, where that is the case, a copy or access to the Personal Data and certain related information. Once we receive and
confirm
that the request comes from you or your
authorized agent
, we will disclose to you:
The categories of Personal Data we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the Personal Data we collected about you;
Our purposes for processing that Personal Data;
Where possible, the envisaged period for which the Personal Data will be stored, or, if not possible, the criteria used to determine that period;
The categories of third parties with whom we share that Personal Data;
The specific pieces of Personal Data we collected about you;
If we sold or disclosed your Personal Data for a business purpose, two separate lists laying out the:
categories of Personal Data sold, and the categories of recipients who purchased the Personal Data; and
categories of Personal Data disclosed for a business purpose, identifying the categories of recipients who obtained the Personal Data;
If we rely on legitimate interests as a lawful basis to process your Personal Data, the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party; and
The appropriate safeguards for transferring data from one country to a third country, if applicable.
Please take into account that certain data protection laws allows us not to satisfy your access request when:
you already have the information;
providing such information proves impossible or would involve a disproportionate effort, or in so far providing such information is likely to render impossible or seriously impair the achievement of the objectives of that processing; and
that Personal Data must remain confidential subject to an obligation of professional secrecy regulated by applicable law, including a statutory obligation of secrecy.
Certain data protection laws do not allow us to disclose account passwords or security questions and answers. We can inform you that we have this information generally, but we may not provide the specific items to you for security and legal reasons.
Right to Correct Your Personal Data
This is called the right to rectification. It gives you the right to ask us to correct anything that you think is wrong with the Personal Data we have on file about you and to complete any incomplete Personal Data.
Right to Delete Your Personal Data
This is called the right to erasure, right to deletion or the “right to be forgotten”. This right means you can ask for your Personal Data to be deleted.
You may be able to remove information from your account after logging in or even to entirely delete your account on our Services. If there is any other Personal Data you would like deleted, you can ask us to do so using the contact information listed in this Notice.
Sometimes we can delete your information, but other times it may not be possible, such as when the law tells us we cannot do so. If that is the case,
we will consider if we can limit how we use it
. There may also be circumstances where we deny your request to delete your information under applicable law, such as if we or our service providers need to retain the Personal Data to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the Personal Data;
Provide a good or Service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform our contract with you;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Debug products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality;
Enable solely internal uses reasonably aligned with your expectations based on your relationship with us;
Comply with a legal obligation; or
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Right to Ask Us to Change How We Process Your Personal Data
This is called the right to restrict processing. It is the right to ask us to only use or store your Personal Data for certain purposes.
You have this right in certain occasions, such as where you believe the data is inaccurate or the processing activity is unlawful. This right enables you to ask us to suspend the usage of Personal Data about you, for example if you want us to establish its accuracy or the reason for processing it.
Right to Ask Us to Stop Using Your Personal Data
This is called the right to object. This is your right to tell us to stop using your Personal Data. You have this right where we rely on a legitimate interest of ours (or of a third party). Also, you have the right to object at any time to the processing of your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes.
We will stop processing the relevant Personal Data unless: (i) we have compelling legitimate grounds for the processing that override your interests, rights, or freedoms; or (ii) we need to continue processing your Personal Data to establish, exercise, or defend a legal claim
Right to Port or Move Your Personal Data
This is called the right to data portability. It is the right to ask for and download Personal Data about you that you have given us or that you have generated by virtue of the use of our services, so that you can:
move it;
copy it;
keep it for yourself; or
transfer it to another organization.
We will provide your Personal Data in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format. When you make a data portability request electronically, we will provide you a copy in electronic format.
Right to Withdraw Your Consent
Where we rely on your consent as the legal basis for processing your Personal Data, you may withdraw your consent at any time. If you withdraw your consent, our use of your Personal Data before you withdraw is still lawful.
If you have given consent for your details to be shared with a third party, and wish to withdraw this consent, please also contact the relevant third party in order to change your preferences.
Right Not to be Discriminated Against for Exercising your Privacy Rights
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your privacy rights, meaning we will not:
deny you goods or Services;
charge you different prices or rates for goods or Services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties; or
provide you a different level or quality of goods or Services.
Right to Lodge a Complaint with a Supervisory Authority
If the GDPR applies to the processing of your Personal Data with us, the GDPR grants you the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if you are not satisfied with how we process your Personal Data. In particular, you can lodge a complaint in the Member State of the European Union of your habitual residence, place of work, or of the alleged violation of the GDPR.
If the LGPD applies to the processing of your Personal Data with us, the LGPD grants you the right to lodge a complaint with the ANPD if you are not satisfied with how we process your Personal Data.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Data
Depending on the region where you are located, you have the “right to opt out” of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Data, which means you have the right to ask us to not sell or share your Personal Data at any time for specified purposes.
A “sale” includes disclosing or making available Personal Data to a third party (other than a service provider) in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration. Under certain data protection laws, “sharing” includes disclosing or making available personal information to a third party for cross-context behavioral advertising. Our use of some online tracking technologies for statistical and marketing purposes is the only sale or share of your Personal Data by Syndigo. To opt out of the sale or sharing of Personal Data, you can change your consent preferences through our cookie consent management platform. In particular, you need to choose not to allow the following categories of cookies: Statistics and marketing.
Please consider that the preferences you submit through the cookie consent management platform, including your requests to opt out from the sale of personal information, may be stored in cookies or similar technologies that are specific to your browser. If this browser is configured to block cookies or similar technologies, our tool may not be able to store your preferences. In addition, deleting cookies on this browser may result in your preferences being removed. If your preferences are removed after you delete cookies from this browser, you will have to update these preferences again. Also, remember that private browsing technologies (such as incognito mode) automatically delete all local storage and cookies when the browsing session ends, preventing us from recording your choice made during the session, and from accessing any local storage created outside of the current session, which does not enable us to access the choice you made during a normal or previous private browsing session.
We’ll only store your preferences in this browser. Because some companies may not connect information about this browser with other web browsers or devices you may use (such as a web browser on another computer you may use, or one on a mobile device), you need update your preferences through the cookie consent management platform to set your preferences separately for other browsers or devices you may use.
You can also alter the configuration of your browser to reject certain types of online tracking technologies. Some browsers have a “Do Not Track” (DNT) feature, but there’s no agreed-upon standard for how websites should respond. Therefore, we currently do not support DNT requests. For more information about how to manage and delete cookies in your browser, please visit
https://www.aboutcookies.org/how-to-manage-and-delete-cookies
.
Your Right to Opt In to the Sale of Your Personal Data
As our use of some of the cookies for statistical and marketing purposes is the only sale of your Personal Data that Syndigo may be engaging in, the only way to opt in to sales of Personal Data is to change your cookie preferences through our cookie consent management platform. In particular, you need to choose to allow the following categories of cookies: Statistics and Marketing.
How Can You Exercise Your Privacy Rights?
To exercise any of the rights described above, please submit a request by either:
Calling us at 1-877-847-5467; or
Contacting us by email at
privacy@syndigo.com
(Preferred method)
Verification of Your Identity
Bear in mind that to evaluate your privacy rights requests, we need to be sure it was you who made the request. Consequently, we may need some information to confirm that you are who you say you are.
For requests submitted via password-protected accounts, your identity is already verified.
For requests sent by other means, you will need to provide us with sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected Personal Data. Generally, we will request only information that we may have about you to confirm your identity, but under some circumstances we may require additional information or documentation to complete your request. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with Personal Data if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request. Making a request does not require you to create an account with us.
We will only use the Personal Data you provide us in a request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
Please note that you may only make a consumer request to know or data portability twice within a 12-month period under the CCPA.
Verification of Authority
If you are submitting a request on behalf of somebody else, we will need to verify your authority to act on behalf of that individual. When contacting us, please provide us with proof that the individual gave you signed permission to submit this request.
Alternatively, you may ask the individual to directly contact us by using the contact details above to verify their identity with us and confirm that they gave you permission to submit this request.
We will only use the Personal Data you provide us in a request to verify your authority.
Response Timing and Format of Our Responses
We will confirm receipt of your request within ten (10) days and, in that communication, we will also describe our identity verification process (if needed) and when you should expect a response, unless we have already granted or denied the request.
Please allow us up to thirty (30) days to reply to you from the day we received your request. If we need more time (up to 90 days in total), we will inform you of the reason why, and the extension period, in writing. If you have an account with us, we will deliver our written response to that account. If you do not have an account with us, we will send our written response by mail or electronically, at your option.
If we cannot satisfy a request from you, we will also explain why in our response.
We will not charge a fee for processing or responding to your requests unless we determine that your request is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. In those cases, we will tell you why we made that determination and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Privacy of Children
Syndigo provides business to business products and Services. The Website and Services are not directed at, or intended for use by, children.
Data Integrity & Security
We are strongly committed to keeping your Personal Data safe. We have implemented and will maintain technical, administrative, and physical measures that are reasonably designed to help protect your Personal Data from unauthorized processing. Unauthorized processing includes unauthorized access, exfiltration, theft, disclosure, alteration, or destruction.
Changes to This Notice
If we make any material change to this Notice, we will post the revised Notice to this web page. We will also update the “Effective” date. By continuing to use the Website after we post any of these changes, you accept the modified Notice.
In our latest update as of the Last Updated Date, we implemented the following changes:
We have included information about our commitment to comply with the Data Privacy Framework and your rights under it.
Contact Us
If you have any questions about this Notice, our processing of your Personal Data, or want to submit a grievance or verifiable consumer request, please write to the Syndigo privacy team by email at
privacy@syndigo.com
or contact us by postal mail at:
Syndigo LLC
Attn: Debra Osborn, Senior Counsel
141 W. Jackson Blvd., Suite 1375
Chicago, IL 60604
United States
Please allow up to four weeks for us to reply.
European Union Representative
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our representative in the EU for data protection matters. While you may also contact us, VeraSafe can be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. To contact VeraSafe, please use this contact form:
https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative
or via telephone at: +420 228 881 031.
Alternatively, VeraSafe can be contacted at:
VeraSafe Ireland Ltd
Unit 3D North Point House
North Point Business Park
New Mallow Road
Cork, T23AT2P
Ireland
United Kingdom Representative
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our representative in the UK for data protection matters. While you may also contact us, VeraSafe can be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. To contact VeraSafe, please use this contact form:
https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative
or via telephone at +44 (20) 4532 2003.
Alternatively, VeraSafe can be contacted at:
VeraSafe United Kingdom Ltd.
37 Albert Embankment
London SE1 7TL
United Kingdom
Data Protection Officer
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our Data Protection Officer (“
DPO
”). While you may contact us directly, VeraSafe can also be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. VeraSafe’s contact details are:
VeraSafe, LLC
100 M Street S.E., Suite 600
Washington, D.C. 20003
USA
Email:
experts@verasafe.com
Web:
https://www.verasafe.com/about-verasafe/contact-us/
Grievance Officer Contact Information
We have appointed VeraSafe as Syndigo’s Grievance Officer pursuant to the requirements of India’s Information Technology Act, 2000, read with the Reasonable Security Practices and Procedures and Sensitive Personal Data or Information (SPDI) Rules, 2011.
VeraSafe may be contacted using the contact details provided below.
VeraSafe, LLC
100 M Street S.E., Suite 600
Washington, D.C. 20003 USA
+1 (617) 398-7067
experts@verasafe.com
Your grievance will be addressed within one month from the date of receipt.
German
Français
Polski
Powered by
Localize
English
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://selfservice.syndigo.com/privacypolicy.html:
Content Experience Suite (“CES”)
Privacy Notice
Last updated: July 16, 2024
Introduction and Scope
Syndigo LLC (“Syndigo,” “we,” “us,” “our”) takes the protection of personally data (“Personal Data”) very seriously.
We collect and process your Personal Data when providing you with access to and use of our web-based software application solution called Content Experience Suite (CES) (the “Services”). This Privacy Notice (the “Notice”) gives you information about what Personal Data we process to provide the Services. When we refer to “you”, we mean the end-users of our Services and the visitors to our customer’s websites where Syndigo’s Enhanced Content application, an analytics feature of CES, is enabled.
In connection with the Services and for the purposes described in this Notice, we act as a storage and service provider. What this means is that we process your Personal Data at our customers’ request to provide you with access to and use of the Services, and to provide analytics to our customers on their instructions.
This Notice
does not
apply to Personal Data we collect by other means or process for other purposes, such as Personal Data that we receive directly through Syndigo’s own publicly accessible website (
www.syndigo.com
), Personal Data we process to provide you with customer support, Personal Data processed in the context of the Syndigo University, as part of our sales and marketing efforts, or the Personal Data of our employees. In those contexts, we act as a controller and our
general privacy notice
applies.
Controllership
In the context of this Notice, Syndigo acts as a “data processor” or “service provider” for the Personal Data we process for our customers through CES. This means that our customers determine the type of Personal Data they provide to us to process on their behalf and what Syndigo must do with it. We typically have no direct relationship with the individuals whose Personal Data we receive from our customers.
Basis of Processing
Within the scope of this Notice, we process Personal Data based on the documented instructions of our customers. To learn about our customers’ lawful bases for processing your Personal Data, please read their privacy notices.
How We Receive Personal Data
We receive your Personal Data in the following ways:
you provide it directly to us as part of using CES as customer-appointed key contact;
our customers (including their employees, contractors, and other representatives of the company) provide it to us;
the Services record your actions while you use the Services;
you visit our customer’s website (only applicable to website visitors of Syndigo customers using the Enhanced Content analytics feature); or
we receive it from other companies within our corporate group.
Categories of Personal Data
We may process the following types of Personal Data:
Identifiers: Username to access the Services, password (hashed), IP address
Biographical Information: First and last name
CES application role: Administrator or regular user
Professional information: role/job title, and company name
Contact information: Business email address, phone number, and physical address
account information, such as username and password (hashed); and
Web analytics data: user, session, and visit IDs (randomly generated GUID), IP address, and (aggregate) site behavior (only applicable to visitors of websites where customer Enhanced Content is embedded).
Purposes of Processing
We process your Personal Data for the following purposes:
enabling your use of and use of the Services, including for user authentication
providing web analytics to our customers (and their suppliers) who use Enhanced Content
Data Retention
We retain Personal Data for as long as instructed by our respective customer (who typically acts as a controller). In the absence of any instruction by the customer, Personal Data used for a project shall be purged once the project is complete, including from backups. As a general rule, we will delete all Personal Data associated with CES end-users within 30 days from the day the account with our customer was cancelled.
Sharing Personal Data with Third Parties
We share your Personal Data with our subsidiaries and affiliates, and with our service providers, who process your Personal Data on our behalf and who agree to use the Personal Data only to assist us in providing our Services or as required by law.. In particular, we share your Personal Data as follows:
1.	Critical Insights, Inc. (USA): They provide cybersecurity consulting services and analysis to Syndigo related to the Services.
2.	Databricks, Inc. (USA): They provide data management and analytics services to Syndigo.
3.	Flexential Corporation (USA): They are a co-location data center for data stored in CES.
4.	Microsoft Corporation (USA): Syndigo uses Azure infrastructure for CES.
5.	Navisite, LLC (USA): They provide emergency database administration.
6.	Okta, Inc (USA): They provide identity and access management for CES users.
7.	Pendo.io, Inc (USA): They provide product analytics.
8.	Salesforce.com, Inc (USA): We use this platform to send notifications to you if there are any outages with the Services.
9.	Twilio, Inc. (USA): We use this platform to send customer notifications.
Additionally, even if customer support is not within the scope of this Notice, please note that employees from other Syndigo entities may process Personal Data to provide you with customer support. These transfers take place in accordance with Syndigo’s Intra Group Data Transfer Agreement, which includes safeguards such as the
Standard Contractual Clauses
(also known as the “SCCs”) approved by the European Commission under
Article 46.2 of the GDPR
.
International Transfers of Personal Data
Syndigo LLC is based in the USA. Our service providers operate globally, but store data in the USA. This means that your Personal Data is primarily stored in the USA by us and our service providers.
For individuals whose Personal Data is safeguarded by data protection laws in the EU or UK: Before transferring your Personal Data from these regions to third parties outside the European Economic Area or the UK, we ensure that there are adequate levels of protection in place for your Personal Data. In cases where we transfer your Personal Data from these regions to third parties in countries which are not recognized as providing an adequate level of protection to Personal Data, we transfer Personal Data when there are appropriate safeguards in place. These safeguards include the Data Privacy Framework, the EU 2021 SCCs, UK International Transfer Addendum, UK International Data Transfer Agreement, and any other approved data transfer mechanisms.
For individuals whose Personal Data is safeguarded by the Data Privacy Framework: Before sending your Personal Data to a third party, we will do one of two things:
•
Seek your consent;
or
•
Demand privacy and security:
We will ensure the third party maintains the same level of privacy and security for your data as we do. We are accountable or liable for the protection of your Personal Data when we transfer it to others except when we can prove that we are not responsible for an event that leads to any unauthorized or improper processing. We either send it to a country, territory or sector within a country that is recognized as providing the same level of personal data protection as the country of origin or the Data Privacy Framework, or use safeguards like the
Data Privacy Framework
(as defined below) or the
SCCs
with necessary adjustments for transfers from the UK or Switzerland, or use specific transfer instruments like the
UK International Data Transfer Agreement
.
We are accountable and liable for the protection of your Personal Data when we transfer it to others except when we can prove that we are not responsible for an event that leads to any unauthorized or improper processing.
Other Disclosure of Your Personal Data
We may disclose your Personal Data if the law requires it, or if we have a good-faith belief that we need to disclose it to comply with official investigations or legal proceedings (where initiated by government officials or private parties). We may also disclose your Personal Data if we sell or transfer all or some of our company’s business interests, assets, or both, or in connection with a corporate restructuring. Finally, we may disclose your Personal Data to our subsidiaries or affiliates for business purposes, if necessary and as described in the section above.
We reserve the right to use aggregated, anonymous data about individuals whose Personal Data we process in our CES application for any legal business purpose. Such data does not include any Personal Data. The purposes may include analyzing usage trends or seeking compatible advertisers, sponsors, and customers.
If we must disclose your Personal Data to comply with official investigations or legal processing started by governmental and/or law enforcement officials, we may not be able to ensure that such recipients will maintain the privacy and security of your Personal Data.
Cookies
To learn about Syndigo’s use of cookies, please read our
Cookie Notice for Context Experience Suite (CES)
.
Data Integrity & Security
Syndigo has implemented and will maintain technical, administrative, and physical measures that are reasonably designed to help protect Personal Data from unauthorized processing such as unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, or destruction.
Risk of Harm
Whenever Personal Data is collected and processed, there is always a slight risk that the Personal Data may be breached, misused, or otherwise result in a harm to you. However, we take several measures to ensure that this risk is mitigated as much as possible. These measures include limiting the Personal Data about you that we collect and process to solely what is necessary, not collecting sensitive Personal Data about you, and implementing appropriate security measures, as described in this Notice.
Your Privacy Rights
If we process your Personal Data, you may have the right to request access to (or to update, correct, or delete) such Personal Data. You may also have the right to ask that we limit our processing of such Personal Data, as well as the right to object to our processing of such Personal Data. You may also have the right to data portability.
Please note that requests should generally be sent directly to the Syndigo customer who provided your Personal Data to us.
Syndigo has limited rights to access and process the Personal Data our customers submit to us or instruct us to process. If sending the request directly to the Syndigo customer is not possible for any reason and you decide to contact us with such a request, please provide the name of the Syndigo customer who submitted your Personal Data to us. We will forward your request to that customer and provide any needed assistance as they respond to your request.
In this section, we also acknowledge the right of EU, UK and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework (as defined below) and will grant individuals reasonable access to Personal Data we received pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework Principles when instructed by our customers. In addition, we will take reasonable steps to permit individuals to correct, amend, or delete such information that is demonstrated to be inaccurate or processed in violation of the Data Privacy Framework Principles. Additionally, if we have received your Personal Data in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework, you may also have the right to opt out of having your Personal Data shared with third parties and to revoke your consent to our sharing your Personal Data with third parties. You may also have the right to opt out if your Personal Data is used for any purpose that is materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected or which you originally authorized. An individual may request to access their Personal Data, or otherwise correct, amend, delete, withdraw their consent or limit the processing of their Personal Data in line with the Data Privacy Framework Principles by contacting our customer.
EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks, and the UK Extension
With respect to Personal Data processed in the scope of this Notice, Syndigo LLC complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) (the “Data Privacy Framework” or “DPF”) as adopted and put forward by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the processing of Personal Data. Syndigo LLC commits to upholding and has certified to the Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Data Privacy Framework Principles. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Notice and the Data Privacy Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles shall govern.
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework, and to view view Syndigo LLC’s certification information, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov
and
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search (search for Syndigo LLC),
, respectively.
U.S. Regulatory Oversight
Syndigo LLC is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission.
Dispute Resolution
Where a privacy complaint or dispute cannot be resolved through our internal processes, we have agreed to participate in the
VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure
. Subject to the terms of the VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure, VeraSafe will provide appropriate recourse free of charge to you. To file a complaint with VeraSafe and participate in the VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure, please submit the required information through the webform located here:
https://www.verasafe.com/privacy-services/dispute-resolution/submit-dispute/
If a complaint or dispute related to Personal Data cannot be resolved through Syndigo’s internal process, in addition to the VeraSafe Dispute Resolution Procedure, Syndigo has agreed to cooperate with the EU data protection authorities and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner, and to take part in the dispute resolution procedures of the panel established by such data protection authorities.
Binding Arbitration
If your dispute or complaint cannot be resolved by us, nor through the dispute resolution program established by VeraSafe, you may have the right to require that we enter binding arbitration with you under the Data Privacy Framework’s “Recourse, Enforcement and Liability Principle” and Annex I of the Data Privacy Framework.
Privacy of Children
Our services are not meant for anyone under the age of 18 and we do not knowingly collect Personal Data from minors. If we learn that we process Personal Data from a child under the age of 13, we will delete the Personal Data we have stored as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any Personal Data from or about a child under the age of 13, please contact us or the customer that has provided the child’s information to us.
Changes to this Notice
If we make any material change to this Notice, we will post the revised Notice to this web page. We will also update the “Effective” date. By continuing to use CES after we post any of these changes, you accept the modified Notice.
In our latest update as of the Last Updated Date, we implemented the following changes:
We have clarified what is within the scope of this Notice and what is not.
We have specified the types of Personal Data we process in more detail.
We have specified the retention period in more detail.
We eliminated information regarding the transfer of Personal Data to other entities that was not applicable. Instead, we focused on providing you with details about the parties responsible for processing your Personal Data and the safeguards we have in place to protect it.
We have included information about our commitment to comply with the Data Privacy Framework and your rights under it.
Contact Us
If you have any questions about this Notice or our processing of your Personal Data, please write to our Privacy Team by email at
privacy@syndigo.com
or by postal mail at:
Syndigo LLC
Attn: Debra Osborn, Senior Counsel
141 W. Jackson Blvd., Ste 1220
Chicago, IL 60604
United States
Please allow up to four weeks for us to reply.
European Union Representative
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our representative in the EU for data protection matters. While you may also contact us, VeraSafe can be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. To contact VeraSafe, please use this contact form:
https://www.verasafe.com/privacy-services/contact-article-27-representative/
or via telephone at: +420 228 881 031.
Alternatively, VeraSafe can be contacted at:
VeraSafe Ireland Ltd
Unit 3D North Point House
North Point Business Park
New Mallow Road
Cork T23AT2P
Ireland
United Kingdom Representative
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our representative in the United Kingdom for data protection matters. While you may also contact us, VeraSafe can be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. To contact VeraSafe, please use this contact form:
https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative
or via telephone at: +44 (20) 4532 2003.
Alternatively, VeraSafe can be contacted at:
VeraSafe United Kingdom Ltd.
37 Albert Embankment
London SE1 7TL
United Kingdom
Data Protection Officer
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our Data Protection Officer (DPO). While you may contact us directly, VeraSafe can also be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. VeraSafe’s contact details are:
VeraSafe, LLC
100 M Street S.E., Suite 600
Washington, D.C. 2000
USA
Email:
experts@verasafe.com
Web:
https://www.verasafe.com/about-verasafe/contact-us/
Sub-policy 1
https://syndigo.com/legal/job-applicant-privacy-notice/:
Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies and tracking technologies
We use cookies to understand and save users’ preferences for future visits and compile aggregate data about site traffic and site interactions in order to offer better site experiences and tools in the future. We also use trusted third-party services that track this information on our behalf. By clicking ‘Accept All’, you consent to the use of all cookies and tracking technologies. To learn more about our use of cookies, view our
Cookie Notice
.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Calendly
8
Learn more about this provider
__cfruid
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
_calendly_session
If consent is given by the visitor, this cookie allows the website to add events into the visitor's calendar.
referrer_user_id
Necessary for the website's booking functionality.
rc::a
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
rc::c
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots.
_ab
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
_mf
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
id
Pending
FormAssembly
11
Learn more about this provider
AWSALB [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBCORS [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBTG [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
AWSALBTGCORS [x2]
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
FORMASSEMBLY [x2]
Used to implement and maintain form settings on the website.
simpleStorage
Preserves the visitor's session state across page requests.
Goconsensus
1
Learn more about this provider
csrf-token
Ensures visitor browsing-security by preventing cross-site request forgery. This cookie is essential for the security of the website and visitor.
Google
1
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
ar_debug
Checks whether a technical debugger-cookie is present.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
li_gc
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Microsoft
1
Learn more about this provider
__RequestVerificationToken
Helps prevent Cross-Site Request Forgery (CSRF) attacks.
Stripe
3
Learn more about this provider
__stripe_mid
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
__stripe_sid
This cookie is necessary for making credit card transactions on the website. The service is provided by Stripe.com which allows online transactions without storing any credit card information.
m
Determines the device used to access the website. This allows the website to be formatted accordingly.
calendly.com
pages.syndigo.com
syndigo.com
vimeo.com
4
__cf_bm [x4]
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
calendly.com
vimeo.com
zoominfo.com
3
_cfuvid [x3]
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
cdn.cookielaw.org
1
OptanonConsent
Determines whether the visitor has accepted the cookie consent box. This ensures that the cookie consent box will not be presented again upon re-entry.
global.localizecdn.com
5
ljs-cache
Version number of the currently cached translation dictionary
ljs-hide
Whether or not localize.js is active on the page
target-lang
Hepls identifiying target language.
wBUMa5sXF0SkDen
Helps translate your Website
wBUMa5sXF0SkDsettings
Helps translate your Website
pages.syndigo.com
1
BIGipServer#
Used to distribute traffic to the website on several servers in order to optimise response times.
pages.syndigo.com
consent.cookiebot.com
2
CookieConsent [x2]
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
syndigo.com
2
loadedLang
To determine the currently selected language of the webpage.
wpEmojiSettingsSupports
This cookie is part of a bundle of cookies which serve the purpose of content delivery and presentation. The cookies keep the correct state of font, blog/picture sliders, color themes and other website settings.
ws.zoominfo.com
1
visitorId
Preserves users states across page requests.
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
Bizible
1
Learn more about this provider
_biz_flagsA
This cookie serves multiple purposes; it determines whether the user has submitted any forms, performed cross-domain migration or has made any tracking opt-out choices.
Calendly
11
Learn more about this provider
sprigReplay#chunkUploads
Tracks user interaction with Calendly for analysis and improvement.
sprigReplay#events
Tracks user interaction with Calendly for analysis and improvement.
sprigReplay#pendingCaptures
Tracks user interaction with Calendly for analysis and improvement.
_pendo_guides_blocked.4cfbcefc-fcf9-4b66-5dc6-9b0d81bb07a9
Used to avoid guide errors when Pendo detects that a visitor has an ad blocker enabled.
_pendo_meta.01234567-89ab-cdef-0123-456789abcdef
This stores a hash of the current metadata so that Pendo can see when it is changed and update it. If disabled, metadata events may be sent too frequently to the point where Pendo may have complications tracking when metadata changes happen.
_pendo_visitorId.4cfbcefc-fcf9-4b66-5dc6-9b0d81bb07a9
This is used to identify and record the visitor information so the information is used in Pendo analytics and Guide delivery.  If disabled, VisitorID is central to all analytics and Guide delivery. The visitorID will not be recorded on any Guide events (i.e. dismiss, advanced, or in segmentation) or usage data until the user has been identified again
pendo_sessionLastUserInteractionEvent
This is used to identify and record the visitor’s account ID that will be used in Pendo like Guide delivery and analytics. If disabled, the account ID will not be recorded with events or xhr events until the user has been identified again. This could cause issues with analytics and Guide delivery.
previous_page_loads
Monitors user navigation patterns and manage session lifecycles effectively.
sprig.anon.env.vid.map
Tracks user interactions for analysis and improvement.
data/guide.gif/#-#-#-#-#
Pending
1
This cookie is used in conjunction with the payment window - The cookie is necessary for making secure transactions on the website.
Drift
5
Learn more about this provider
DRIFT_openTabs
Used to make the chat function consistent across tabs, if the user has multiple browser tabs open for the same website.
DRIFT_SESSION_ID
Allows the website to recoqnise the visitor, in order to optimize the chat-box functionality.
DRIFT_SESSION_STARTED
Stores a unique ID string for each chat-box session. This allows the website-support to see previous issues and reconnect with the previous supporter.
DRIFT_visitCounts
Determines the number of visits of the specific visitor. This is used in order to make the chat-box function more relevant.
driftt_aid
Necessary for the functionality of the website's chat-box function.
Microsoft
3
Learn more about this provider
MuidSyncDomain
Pending
MuidSyncTimestamp
Pending
FormsWebSessionId
The cookie is used if the visitor has filled in personal information on a formula. This information will be filled in automatically on other formulas. This process is used to optimize visitor experience.
Vimeo
2
Learn more about this provider
player
Saves the user's preferences when playing embedded videos from Vimeo.
sync_active
Contains data on visitor's video-content preferences - This allows the website to remember parameters such as preferred volume or video quality. The service is provided by Vimeo.com.
YouTube
1
Learn more about this provider
yt.innertube::nextId
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
global.localizecdn.com
3
ljs-lang
Currently selected language of the page
ljs-source-lang
Source language ID of the page
pageIsDisabled
Page is disabled from multi language translation.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Calendly
4
Learn more about this provider
pendo_cd
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
ajs_anonymous_id
This cookie is used to count how many times a website has been visited by different visitors - this is done by assigning the visitor an ID, so the visitor does not get registered twice.
userleap.ids
This cookie is set to make split-tests on the website, which optimizes the website's relevance towards the visitor – the cookie can also be set to improve the visitor's experience on a website.
data/ptm.gif/4cfbcefc-fcf9-4b66-5dc6-9b0d81bb07a9
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
Google
3
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_ga
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
_ga_#
Used by Google Analytics to collect data on the number of times a user has visited the website as well as dates for the first and most recent visit.
_gcl_ls
Pending
Microsoft
1
Learn more about this provider
c.gif
Collects data on the user’s navigation and behavior on the website. This is used to compile statistical reports and heatmaps for the website owner.
Segment
1
Learn more about this provider
ajs_anonymous_id
This cookie is used to identify a specific visitor - this information is used to identify the number of specific visitors on a website.
Vimeo
2
Learn more about this provider
_dd_s
Registers the website's speed and performance. This function can be used in context with statistics and load-balancing.
vuid
Collects data on the user's visits to the website, such as which pages have been read.
assets.calendly.com
player.vimeo.com
2
dd_cookie_test_# [x2]
Registers data on visitors' website-behaviour. This is used for internal analysis and website optimization.
global.localizecdn.com
1
ljs-visits
Number of pageviews
ws.zoominfo.com
2
ziwsSession
Collects statistics on the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
ziwsSessionId
Collects statistics on the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
3
Learn more about this provider
lastExternalReferrer
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
lastExternalReferrerTime
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
_fbp
Used by Facebook to deliver a series of advertisement products such as real time bidding from third party advertisers.
Appnexus
1
Learn more about this provider
receive-cookie-deprecation
Collects information on user behaviour on multiple websites. This information is used in order to optimize the relevance of advertisement on the website.
Bizible
7
Learn more about this provider
_BUID
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
ipv
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_dfsA
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_kvpA
Collects data on user visits to the website, such as what pages have been accessed. The registered data is used to categorise the user's interest and demographic profiles in terms of resales for targeted marketing.
_biz_nA
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_pendingA
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
_biz_uid
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
Calendly
3
Learn more about this provider
pendo_tabId
Collects data on the user across websites - This data is used to make advertisement more relevant.
ajs_group_id
Collects data on visitors. This information is used to assign visitors into segments, making website advertisement more efficient.
ajs_user_id
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
Drift
4
Learn more about this provider
DRIFT_NOTIFICATION_PLAYED
Pending
DRIFT_SESSION_CAMPAIGNS
Used to determine when and where certain pop-ups on the website should be presented for the user and remember whether the user has closed these, to keep them from showing multiple times.
drift_aid
Sets a unique ID for the specific user. This allows the website to target the user with relevant offers through its chat functionality.
drift_campaign_refresh
Sets a unique ID for the specific user. This allows the website to target the user with relevant offers through its chat functionality.
Google
5
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
IDE
Used by Google DoubleClick to register and report the website user's actions after viewing or clicking one of the advertiser's ads with the purpose of measuring the efficacy of an ad and to present targeted ads to the user.
test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
NID
Registers a unique ID that identifies a returning user's device. The ID is used for targeted ads.
pagead/1p-user-list/#
Tracks if the user has shown interest in specific products or events across multiple websites and detects how the user navigates between sites. This is used for measurement of advertisement efforts and facilitates payment of referral-fees between websites.
_gcl_au
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement efficiency across websites using their services.
LinkedIn
2
Learn more about this provider
bcookie
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
lidc
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
Microsoft
5
Learn more about this provider
MR [x2]
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
SRM_B
Tracks the user’s interaction with the website’s search-bar-function. This data can be used to present the user with relevant products or services.
ANONCHK
Registers data on visitors from multiple visits and on multiple websites. This information is used to measure the efficiency of advertisement on websites.
SM
Registers a unique ID that identifies the user's device during return visits across websites that use the same ad network. The ID is used to allow targeted ads.
Segment
3
Learn more about this provider
__tld__
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
ajs_group_id
This cookie is used to assign specific visitors into segments, this segmentation is based on visitor behavior on the website - the segmentation can be used to target larger groups.
ajs_user_id
This cookie is used to collect data on the visitor's behavior on the website - this information can be used to assign the visitor to a visitor segment, based on common preferences.
YouTube
12
Learn more about this provider
#-#
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
iU5q-!O9@$
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
LogsDatabaseV2:V#||LogsRequestsStore
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
nextId
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
requests
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
ServiceWorkerLogsDatabase#SWHealthLog
Necessary for the implementation and functionality of YouTube video-content on the website.
TESTCOOKIESENABLED
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Tries to estimate the users' bandwidth on pages with integrated YouTube videos.
YSC
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
YtIdbMeta#databases
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
b.6sc.co
1
v1/beacon/img.gif
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
bing.com
forms.cloud.microsoft
3
MUID [x3]
Used widely by Microsoft as a unique user ID. The cookie enables user tracking by synchronising the ID across many Microsoft domains.
j.6sc.co
4
_6senseCompanyDetails
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_an_uid
Presents the user with relevant content and advertisement. The service is provided by third-party advertisement hubs, which facilitate real-time bidding for advertisers.
_gd_session
Collects visitor data related to the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been loaded, with the purpose of displaying targeted ads.
_gd_visitor
Collects visitor data related to the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been loaded, with the purpose of displaying targeted ads.
syndigo.com
1
SyndigolastVisit
Pending
Unclassified
0
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
We do not use cookies of this type.
Cross-domain consent
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS_COUNT#]
[#BULK_CONSENT_TITLE#]
List of domains your consent applies to:
[#BULK_CONSENT_DOMAINS#]
Cookie declaration last updated on 2/27/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
A “cookie” is a small text file stored on your device that contains information about your device. Syndigo uses cookies to allow our website to operate, to increase its functionality and efficiency, to analyze how you use our website in order to improve it, and to tailor the content and information that we display to you (including targeted advertisements).
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of our website. For all other types of cookies, we need your consent. This website uses different types of cookies. To read more about the different types of cookies used by this website, please go to our cookie notice:
https://syndigo.com/legal/cookie-notice/
.
You can, at any time, change or withdraw your consent by either changing the settings in this cookie banner, or by contacting us using the information in the cookie notice. You can also alter the configuration of your browser to reject certain types of cookies by setting global privacy controls (GPC). For more information on GPC, please visit:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#download
. You may also set your browser to send a Do Not Track (DNT) signals. For more information on DNT, please visit
https://www.aboutcookies.org/
and
https://allaboutdnt.com/
.
If you want to understand how we process your personal data, please view our privacy notice:
https://syndigo.com/legal/privacy-policy/
Do not sell or share my personal information
Only strictly necessary
Accept selected
Customize
Accept all
Syndigo Job Applicant Privacy Notice
Effective on: July 10, 2024
Privacy Summary
OUR CONTACT INFORMATION
Syndigo LLC
Email address:
privacy@syndigo.com
Data Protection Officer:
VeraSafe LLC, 1-888-376-1079,
experts@verasafe.com
Identity and contact details of Syndigo’s Data Protection Representative in the EU:
click
here
.
Identity and contact details of Syndigo’s Data Protection Representative in the UK:
click
here
.
OUR AFFILIATE ENTITIES
Which are the entities covered by this Notice?
Syndigo LLC
Syndigo UK Limited
Syndigo Canada Inc.
Syndigo Mexico S.A. DE C.V.
Syndigo EMEA Ltd.
FSEnet Latin America Tecnologia da Informacao Ltda
Syndigo Europe SAS
Syndigo Deutschland GmbH
Wisebase Sp. z o. o.
Riversand Technologies, Inc.
Riversand Technologies India Private Limited
Riversand Technologies Europe AG
Attribytes, Inc.
GENERAL INFORMATION
Do we collect Personal Data?
YES. Some of the categories we collect include identifiers, job application-related information, such as your name, education information and your job history.   Click
here
to know which categories of Personal Data we collect and how we obtain them.
Do we process special categories of data or sensitive personal information, such as health data?
YES. Some categories we collect include gender, ethnic origin, and health data.
Click
here
to know which categories of Personal Data we collect and how we obtain them.
Do we sell Personal Data?
The use of some third-party cookies on our website may be considered under certain data privacy laws as a sale of Personal Data, such as the cookies we use to deliver interest-based ads to you. We do not directly sell your Personal Data in the conventional sense (for money).   If you would like to opt out of the sale of your Personal Data that take place via cookies, you can learn how
here
.
PRIVACY RIGHTS
Can you request a copy of the Personal Data we have collected about you?
YES Click
here
to learn how.
Can you request to have your Personal Data deleted?
YES Click
here
to learn how.
Do we discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights?
NO Click
here
to learn more about your right not to be discriminated against.
SECURITY
Do we protect your Personal Data?
YES Click
here
to learn more about how we protect your Personal Data.
SUMMARY
What can you find in this Notice?
This Notice tells you, among other things:
what Personal Data we collect about you and how we obtain it
;
for what purposes we use that Personal Data;
how long we keep your Personal Data
;
with whom we share your Personal Data
;
your rights about the Personal Data we collect about you and how you can exercise those rights;
how we protect your Personal Data;
and
how to contact us
.
1. Introduction
Syndigo LLC and its affiliates (collectively, “
Syndigo
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”) take the protection of the individuals applying for an open position at Syndigo (“
job applicants
”, “
you
”, “
your
”) personal data (“
Personal Data
”) very seriously. Please read this Job Applicant Privacy Notice (this “
Notice
”) to learn what Personal Data we collect about you in relation to processing your application and evaluating your suitability for working at Syndigo, why and how we collect and use it, how we secure it, and with whom we might share it.
This Notice also informs you of your privacy rights under the:
European Union General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”);
United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“
UK GDPR
”) and the Data Protection Act;
Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection;
EU-U.S., Swiss-U.S., and UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework;
California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“
CCPA
”) and California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CPRA
”);
Canadian Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“
PIPEDA
”);
Mexican Federal Law on Protection of Personal Data Held by Private Parties and the Regulations to the Federal Law on Protection of Personal Data Held by Private Parties;
Brazilian Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“
LGPD
”); and
Indian Information Technology Act, Information Technology (Reasonable Security Practices and Procedures and Sensitive Personal Data or Information) Rules (together, “
Applicable Data Protection Laws
”).
Syndigo has adopted this Notice to comply with Applicable Data Protection Laws. Any terms defined in Applicable Data Protection Laws have the same meaning as when used in this Notice.
2. What Is Covered by this Notice
This Notice is designed to help you understand how we process your Personal Data when you apply for an open position at Syndigo. We process your Personal Data for the purposes of recruiting you, which is a process that involves but is not limited to assessing your suitability for an open position at Syndigo (the “
Recruitment Process
”).
Within the scope of this Notice, Syndigo is the business that makes the decisions about the processing of the Personal Data we collect or that others collect on our behalf (also known as the “data controller” or the “business”).
This Notice does not cover any other data collection or processing, including the data related to our staff (employees or independent contractors), our website, web applications, or mobile applications (for which we act as the “data controller”), or the data we host for our customers via our SaaS applications (and for which we act as a “data processor” or “service provider”). For more information about our collection of Personal Data in other contexts, please see:
https://syndigo.com/legal/
. If you are engaged by Syndigo as an employee or independent contractor, the processing of your Personal Data will be governed by Syndigo Global Employee Privacy Notice.
3. What Personal Data We Process and How We Obtain It
The table below describes the categories of Personal Data we collect during our Recruitment Process and which we have collected in the preceding twelve (12) months.
Personal Data We Collect, Process, or Store
How We Obtain It
Identifiers
First and last name, email address, phone number
We collect this information when you submit an application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website or when you apply for an open position through LinkedIn. We may also collect this information from your CV or resume when you submit it along with your application. We may also obtain it from third parties such as a recruiting or hiring agency, former employer or reference, public resources.
Special Categories of Data
Voluntary provided gender, ethnic origin, disability status, data concerning health
We may collect this information if you voluntary provide it to us when you submit an application on the Syndigo’s careers page on our website or if you provide it in your CV or resume when you submit it along with your application.
Education and Employment Background
Previous and current job titles, company, or organization of current or previous employment, location of company or organization, dates of employment, description of work performed, name of school, level of education, degree acquired, major and/or minor studied, time spent acquiring the degree, description of degree obtained, professional qualifications
We collect this information when you submit an application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website or when you apply for an open position through LinkedIn. We may also collect this information from your CV or resume when you submit it along with your application. We may also obtain it from third parties such as a recruiting or hiring agency, former employer or reference, public resources.
Skills Acquired
Descriptions of skills acquired
We may collect this information when you submit an application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website or when you apply for an open position through LinkedIn. We may also collect this information from your CV or resume when you submit it along with your application.
Work Styles and Preferences
Descriptions of your work style
We may collect this information when you submit an application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website or when you apply for an open position through LinkedIn.  We may also collect this information from documents you submit along with your application.
Motivations for Performing the Job
Descriptions of what motivates you to perform the job
We may collect this information when you submit an application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website or when you apply for an open position through LinkedIn. We may collect this information from documents you submit along with your application.
Licenses and Certifications
Name of license or certification name, license number, date that you achieved the certification, renewal date of the certification date
We collect this information when you submit an application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website or when you apply for an open position through LinkedIn. We may also collect this information from your CV or resume when you submit it along with your application.
Links to Personal Websites
Link title and URL
We collect this information when you submit application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website. We may also collect this information from your CV or resume when you submit it along with your application.
Referrals
Specifics of how you heard about the Syndigo opportunity you are applying for and whether you were referred by a current Syndigo employee
We may collect this information during the Recruitment Process.
Compensation Expectation Information
Details on desired salary, bonus, commission, and on-target earnings
We collect this information when you submit application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website. We may also collect this information from your CV, resume, or other documents you submit along with your application.
Preferred Working Environment
Details on where and how often you can perform the job in various Syndigo locations
We collect this information when you submit application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website. We may also collect this information from your CV, resume, or other documents you submit along with your application.
Internet or Other Similar Network Activity
Browsing history, search history, information on your interaction with our website
We collect this information from your activity when you visit Syndigo’s careers page on our website.
Inferences drawn from Personal Data Submitted
Profile reflecting a person’s mental aptitude, work style, motivations, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behavior, attitudes, intelligence, and abilities
We collect this information by analyzing the information that you have provided to us when you submit application directly through Syndigo’s careers page on our website or when you apply for an open position through LinkedIn, information we obtain from your CV, resume, or other documents you submit along with your application.
Some of this information may qualify as special categories of Personal Data or sensitive personal information under Applicable Data Protection Laws. We do not require processing special categories of Personal Data or sensitive personal information for assessing your suitability for an open position at Syndigo. We will only process such Personal Data if you voluntary provide it to us to comply with our legal obligations.
We will not collect additional categories of Personal Data without informing you.
4. Lawful Bases for Processing
The GDPR and other applicable data protection laws require that we have a valid reason to use your Personal Data. This is called the “lawful basis for processing.” We may process your Personal Data:
Because you gave your consent.
Because we need to perform a contract with you.
Because we have a legitimate interest in processing your Personal Data and it is not overridden by your rights. Our interests include: assessing your suitability for employment ay Syndigo.
Because we need to comply with the law.
On another ground, as required or permitted by law.
When we rely on legitimate interests as a lawful basis of processing, you have the right to ask us more about how we decided to choose this legal basis, and you have the right to object to processing on this basis. To do so, please use the contact details provided
here
.
Where we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you
may withdraw it at any time
. However, this will not affect the lawfulness of our processing before you withdrew your consent. It will also not affect the validity of our processing of Personal Data performed on other lawful grounds.
Where we receive your Personal Data as part of the Recruitment Process based on a contract, we require such Personal Data to be able to carry out the contract. Without that necessary Personal Data, we will not be able to carry out the Recruitment Process.
5. Cookies
To learn about Syndigo’s use of cookies and the use of opt-out preference signals such as Global Privacy Control (“
GPC
“), please read our
Cookie Notice
.
6. For What Purposes Do We Use Your Personal Data
We may process your Personal Data (including special categories of Personal Data or sensitive personal information) for one or more of the following purposes:
Recruiting purposes, such as conducting the Recruitment Process, assessing your skills and qualifications, arranging interviews or testing, and making hiring decisions;
Deciding whether to offer you a job;
Preparing the offer letter;
Communicating with you during the Recruitment Process;
Responding to your requests or questions;
Engaging in necessary precontractual activities or negotiations;
Making the needed arrangements for your future employment;
Proactively conducting research about your educational and professional background and skills and contacting you if we think you would be suitable for another role at Syndigo.
Making improvements to Syndigo’s job application and/or Recruitment Process, including improving interview practices, and improving diversity, equity, and inclusion in our Recruitment Process;
Talent management; and
Record keeping.
To achieve the above purposes, we need to perform different types of processing activities on your Personal Data, such as storage, access, transmission, consultation, manipulation, and combination.
7. How Long We Keep Your Personal Data
If you are offered and accept a job at Syndigo, the Personal Data we collect about you process during the Recruitment will be included as part of your ongoing employment record. We retain your employment record in accordance with our employment record retention policy.
If you do not receive or accept a job offer from Syndigo, we will keep your Personal Data for eighteen (18) months after the relevant Recruitment Process. We keep your Personal Data so we can contact you for other current and future employment opportunities at Syndigo.
When the purposes of processing are satisfied, we will delete your Personal Data in accordance with our data retention policy and applicable laws and regulations. We will also delete your Personal Data upon receipt of a verified request.
8. Automated Decision-Making
You will not be subject to decisions that will have a significant impact on you based solely on automated decision-making. There will always be human intervention into decisions based on automated processing, including automated profiling. If this position changes, or there is a need and lawful basis to do so, we will inform you.
9. Sharing Personal Data with Third Parties
We share your Personal Data with certain third parties who assist us in operating our Recruitment Process. Syndigo enters into data processing agreements with these third parties to ensure that they keep your Personal Data protected and only use it for the services they provide Syndigo during the Recruitment Process. They therefore must treat your Personal Data with the same level of protection that we do. The categories of third parties to which we may disclose your Personal Data include:
Recruiting software service providers
Internet service providers
Cloud service providers
Email service providers
Email security services providers
Project management tool providers
Office tool providers
Online work collaboration tools
Reporting, business intelligence, and analytics service providers
We have disclosed your Personal Data to certain third parties, listed below, for business purposes. Syndigo may update this list from time to time. We will inform you about the updated list by updating the Effective Date on this Notice.
Name of Third Party
Address
Categories of Personal Data That May Be Disclosed for Business Purposes
Crosschq, Inc.
145 E Prospect Ave.
Danville, CA 94526, USA
Identifiers; Special Categories of Data; Professional or employment-related information; Biometric information; Non-public education information; Internet or similar network activity; Inferences drawn from other Personal Data.
DocuSign, Inc.
221 Main Street, Suite 1550, San Francisco, California, 94105, USA
Identifiers; Special Categories of Data; Professional or employment-related information; Biometric information; Non-public education information; Internet or similar network activity; Inferences drawn from other Personal Data.
Greenhouse Software, Inc.
18 West 18th Street, 11th Floor, New York, New York, 10011, USA
Identifiers; Special Categories of Data; Professional or employment-related information; Biometric information; Non-public education information; Internet or similar network activity; Inferences drawn from other Personal Data.
LinkedIn Corporation
Sunnyvale, CA , USA
Identifiers; Professional or employment-related information; Non-public education information; Internet or similar network activity.
Microsoft Corporation
1 Microsoft Way, Redmond, Washington 98052, USA
Identifiers; Special Categories of Data; Professional or employment-related information; Biometric information; Non-public education information; Internet or similar network activity; Inferences drawn from other Personal Data.
Syndigo LLC is based in the USA. Our service providers operate globally, but store data in the USA. This means that your Personal Data is primarily stored in the USA by us and our service providers.
For individuals whose Personal Data is safeguarded by data protection laws in the EU or UK: Before transferring your Personal Data from these regions to third parties outside the European Economic Area or the UK, we ensure that there are adequate levels of protection in place for your Personal Data. In cases where we transfer your Personal Data from these regions to third parties in countries which are not recognized as providing an adequate level of protection to Personal Data, we transfer Personal Data when there are appropriate safeguards in place. These safeguards include the EU-U.S., Swiss-U.S., and UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (together “Data Privacy Framework”), the EU 2021 SCCs, UK International Transfer Addendum, UK International Data Transfer Agreement, and any other approved data transfer mechanisms.
For individuals whose Personal Data is safeguarded by the Data Privacy Framework:
Before sending your Personal Data to a third party, we will do one of two things:
Seek your consent; or
Demand privacy and security: We will ensure the third party maintains the same level of privacy and security for your data as we do. We are accountable or liable for the protection of your Personal Data when we transfer it to others except when we can prove that we are not responsible for an event that leads to any unauthorized or improper processing. We either send it to a country, territory or sector within a country that is recognized as providing the same level of personal data protection as the country of origin or the Data Privacy Framework, or use safeguards like the Data Privacy Framework, the EU 2021 SCCs, UK International Data Transfer Agreement, UK International Transfer Addendum, and any other approved data transfer mechanisms.
We are accountable and liable for the protection of your Personal Data when we transfer it to others except when we can prove that we are not responsible for an event that leads to any unauthorized or improper processing.
Sales or Sharing of Your Personal Data
Syndigo generally does not directly sell your Personal Data in the conventional sense (for money). Like many companies, however, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you or analyze our website traffic and may transfer Personal Data to business partners for their use. Making Personal Data (such as online identifiers or browsing activity) available to these companies may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” under the CCPA.
If you would like to opt out of the sales or sharing activities of your Personal Data that take place via cookies, you can learn how
here
.
Syndigo does not expect that the Personal Data of individuals under 16 is being collected, sold or shared, given that children are not expected to apply for an open position at Syndigo.
Other Disclosures of Your Personal Data
We may disclose your Personal Data to the extent required by law or if we have a good-faith belief that we need to disclose it in order to comply with official investigations or legal proceedings (whether initiated by governmental/law enforcement officials, or private parties). If we have to disclose your Personal Data to governmental/law enforcement officials, we may not be able to ensure that those officials will maintain the privacy and security of your Personal Data.
We may also disclose your Personal Data if we sell or transfer all or some of our company’s business interests, assets, or both, or in connection with a corporate restructuring. Finally, we may disclose your Personal Data to our subsidiaries or affiliates, but only if necessary for Recruitment Purposes, as described in the section above.
10. Risk of Harm
Whenever Personal Data is collected and processed, there is always a slight risk that the Personal Data may be breached, misused, or otherwise result in a harm to you. However, we take several measures to ensure that this risk is mitigated as much as possible. These measures include limiting the Personal Data about you that we collect and process to solely what is necessary, not collecting sensitive Personal Data about you, and implementing appropriate security measures, as described in this Notice.
11. What Privacy Rights Do You Have?
You have specific rights regarding your Personal Data collected and processed by us. In this section, we first describe those rights and then we explain
how you can exercise those rights
.
Right to Know What Happens to Your Personal Data
This is called the right to be informed. It means that you have the right to obtain from us all information about our Personal Data processing activities that concern you, such as how we collect and use your Personal Data, how long we will keep it, and who it will be shared with, among other things. We are informing you of how we process your Personal Data with this Notice.
Right to Know What Personal Data Syndigo Has About You
This is called the right of access. This right allows you to ask for full details of the Personal Data we hold about you.
You have the right to obtain from us confirmation as to whether or not we process Personal Data concerning you, and, where that is the case, a copy or access to the Personal Data and certain related information. Once we receive and
confirm
that the request comes from you or your
authorized agent
, we will disclose to you:
The categories of Personal Data we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the Personal Data we collected about you;
Our purposes for processing that Personal Data;
Where possible, the envisaged period for which the Personal Data will be stored, or, if not possible, the criteria used to determine that period;
The categories of third parties to which we disclose that Personal Data, with whom we share it, or “sell” it to;
The specific pieces of Personal Data we collected about you;
If we rely on legitimate interests as a lawful basis to process your Personal Data, the legitimate interests pursued; and
The appropriate safeguards for transferring data from the EEA, or UK to a third country, if applicable.
Please take into account that the GDPR allows us not to satisfy your access request when:
you already have the information;
providing such information proves impossible or would involve a disproportionate effort, or in so far providing such information is likely to render impossible or seriously impair the achievement of the objectives of that processing; and
that Personal Data must remain confidential subject to an obligation of professional secrecy regulated by Union or Member State law, including a statutory obligation of secrecy.
We will not disclose account passwords or security questions and answers. We can inform you that we have this information generally, but we may not provide the specific items to you for security and legal reasons.
Right to Correct Your Personal Data
This is called the right to rectification. It gives you the right to ask us to correct anything that you think is wrong with the Personal Data we have on file about you and to complete any incomplete Personal Data.
Right to Delete Your Personal Data
This is called the right to erasure, right to deletion or the “right to be forgotten”. This right means you can ask for your Personal Data to be deleted.
Sometimes we can delete your information, but other times it may not be possible, such as when the law requires us to keep certain information. If that is the case, we will consider if we can limit how we use it. There may also be circumstances where we deny your request to delete your information under applicable law, such as if we or our third party service providers need to retain the Personal Data to:
complete the Recruitment Process;
provide a service you requested that is linked to the Recruitment Process;
take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing relationship with you, or otherwise perform a contract with you that is linked to the Recruitment Process;
detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
debug products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality;
enable solely internal uses reasonably aligned with your expectations based on your relationship with us during the Recruitment Process;
comply with a legal obligation, including (but not limited to) obligations from the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act; or
make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
Right to Ask Us to Change How We Process Your Personal Data
This is called the right to restrict processing. It is the right to ask us to only use or store your Personal Data for certain purposes.
You have this right in certain occasions, such as where you believe the data is inaccurate or the processing activity is unlawful. This right enables you to ask us to suspend the usage of Personal Data about you, for example if you want us to establish its accuracy or the reason for processing it.
Right to Ask Us to Stop Using Your Personal Data
This is called the
right to object
. This is your right to tell us to stop using your Personal Data. You have this right where we rely on a legitimate interest of ours (or of a third party).
We will stop processing the relevant Personal Data unless: (i) we have compelling legitimate grounds for the processing that override your interests, rights, or freedoms; or (ii) we need to continue processing your Personal Data to establish, exercise, or defend a legal claim.
Right to Port or Move Your Personal Data
This is called the right to data portability. It is the right to ask for and download Personal Data about you that you have given us or that you have generated by virtue of your participation in the Recruitment Process, so that you can:
move it;
copy it;
keep it for yourself; or
transfer it to another organization.
We will provide your Personal Data in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format. When you make a data portability request electronically, we will provide you a copy in electronic format.
Right to Withdraw Your Consent
Where we rely on your consent as the legal basis for processing your Personal Data, you may withdraw your consent at any time. If you withdraw your consent, our use of your Personal Data before you withdraw is still lawful.
If you have given consent for your details to be shared with a third party, and wish to withdraw this consent, please also contact the relevant third party in order to change your preferences.
Right Not to be Discriminated Against for Exercising your Privacy Rights
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your privacy rights, meaning we will not deny you a chance to apply or re-apply for future positions at Syndigo.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Data
You have the “right to opt out”, which means you have the right to ask us to not sell or “share” (for cross-context behavioral advertising) your Personal Data at any time.
As our use of some of the cookies that we use for statistical and marketing purposes is the only type of sale or sharing of your Personal Data that Syndigo may be engaging in, the only way to opt out of sales of Personal Data is to change your cookie preferences through our cookie consent management platform. In particular, you need to choose not to allow the following categories of cookies:
Statistics
Marketing
Please consider that the preferences you submit through the cookie consent management platform, including your requests to opt out from the sale of personal information, may be stored in cookies or similar technologies that are specific to your browser. If this browser is configured to block cookies or similar technologies, our tool may not be able to store your preferences. In addition, deleting cookies on this browser may result in your preferences being removed. If your preferences are removed after you delete cookies from this browser, you will have to update these preferences again. Also, remember that private browsing technologies (such as incognito mode) automatically delete all local storage and cookies when the browsing session ends, preventing us from recording your choice made during the session; and prevent us from accessing any local storage created outside of the current session, which does not enable us to access the choice you made during a normal or previous private browsing session.
We’ll store your preferences only in this browser. Because some companies may not connect information about this browser with other web browsers or devices you may use (such as a web browser on another computer you may use, or one on a mobile device), you need to update your preferences through the cookie consent management platform to set your preferences separately for other browsers or devices you may use.
Your Right to Opt Into the Sale of Your Personal Data
As our use of some of the cookies that we use for statistical and marketing purposes is the only sale of your Personal Data that Syndigo may be engaging in, the only way to opt into sales of Personal Data is to change your cookie preferences through our cookie consent management platform. In particular, you need to choose to allow the following categories of cookies:
Statistics
Marketing
Right to Lodge a Complaint with a Supervisory Authority
If the GDPR applies to the processing of your Personal Data with us, the GDPR grants you the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority if you are not satisfied with how we process your Personal Data. In particular, you can lodge a complaint in the Member State of the EEA of your habitual residence, place of work, or of the alleged violation of the GDPR. You can find the details of the authorities of each member State
here
.
If the UK GDPR applies to our processing of your Personal Data, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the
UK Information Commissioner’s Office
.
If the LGPD applies to our processing of your Personal Data, the LGPD grants you the right to lodge a complaint with the
ANPD
if you are not satisfied with how we process your Personal Data.
EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the UK Extension
With respect to Personal Data processed in the scope of this Notice, Syndigo LLC complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (and its UK Extension) and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (the “Data Privacy Framework”) as adopted and put forward by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the processing of Personal Data. Syndigo commits to upholding the Data Privacy Framework’s Principles. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Notice and the Data Privacy Frameworks Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles shall govern.
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework, and to view Syndigo LLC’s certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
and
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search
(search for Syndigo LLC), respectively
Syndigo LLC acknowledges the right of EU, UK and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework and will grant individuals reasonable access to Personal Data we received pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework Principles. In addition, we will take reasonable steps to permit individuals to correct, amend, or delete such information that is demonstrated to be inaccurate or processed in violation of the Data Privacy Framework’s Principles. Additionally, if we have received your Personal Data in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework, you may also have the right to opt out of having your Personal Data shared with third parties and to revoke your consent to our sharing your Personal Data with third parties. You may also have the right to opt out if your Personal Data is used for any purpose that is materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected or which you originally authorized. An individual may request to access their Personal Data, or otherwise correct, amend, delete, withdraw their consent or limit the processing of their Personal Data in line with the Data Privacy Framework Principles by contacting us.
U.S. Regulatory Oversight
Syndigo LLC is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission.
Dispute Resolution
If a complaint or dispute related to Personal Data cannot be resolved through Syndigo’s internal process, in addition to the VeraSafe Dispute Resolution Procedure, Syndigo has agreed to cooperate with the EU data protection authorities (“DPAs”), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (“ICO”) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (“FDPIC”), and to take part in the dispute resolution procedures of the panel established by such data protection authorities.
Binding Arbitration
If your dispute or complaint cannot be resolved by us, nor through the dispute resolution procedures of the DPAs, the ICO or the FDPIC, you may have the right to require that we enter into binding arbitration with you pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework’s “Recourse, Enforcement and Liability Principle” and Annex I of the Data Privacy Framework.
12. How Can You Exercise Your Privacy Rights?
To exercise any of the rights described above, please submit a request by either:
Calling us at 1-877-847-5467; or
Contacting us by email at
privacy@syndigo.com
(Preferred method)
13. Verification of Your Identity
Bear in mind that to evaluate your privacy rights requests, we need to be sure it was you who made the request. Consequently, we may need some information to confirm that you are who you say you are.
For requests submitted via password-protected accounts, your identity is already verified.
For requests sent by other means, you will need to provide us with sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected Personal Data. Generally, we will request only information that we may have about you to confirm your identity, but under some circumstances we may require additional information or documentation to complete your request. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with Personal Data if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will only use the Personal Data you provide us in a request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
Please note that you may only make a consumer request to know or data portability twice within a 12-month period under the CCPA.
14. Verification of Authority
If you are submitting a request on behalf of somebody else, we will need to verify your authority to act on behalf of that individual. When contacting us, please provide us with proof that the individual gave you signed permission to submit this request, a valid power of attorney on behalf of the individual.
Alternatively, you may ask the individual to directly contact us by using the contact details above to verify their identity with us and confirm with us that they gave you permission to submit this request. We will only use the Personal Data you provide us in a request to verify your authority.
15. Response Timing and Format of Our Responses
We will confirm the receipt of your request within ten (10) days and, in that communication, we will also describe our identity verification process (if needed) and when you should expect a response, unless we have already granted or denied the request.
Please allow us up to thirty (30) days to reply to you from the day we received your request. If we need more time (up to 90 days in total), we will inform you of the reason why, and the extension period, in writing. If we cannot satisfy a request from you, we will also explain why in our response.
We will not charge a fee for processing or responding to your requests unless we determine that your request is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. In those cases, we will tell you why we made that determination and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
16. Privacy of Children
The Recruitment Process is not directed at children under the age of 16. Children under the age of 16 will not participate in the Recruitment Process. If you believe we might have any Personal Data from or about a child under 16, please contact us by using the contact details provided
here
. If we learn that we have collected or received Personal Data from a child under 16 without parental consent, we will delete that Personal Data.
17. Data Integrity & Security
We are strongly committed to keeping your Personal Data safe. We have implemented and will maintain technical, administrative, and physical measures that are reasonably designed to help protect your Personal Data from unauthorized processing. Unauthorized processing includes unauthorized access, exfiltration, theft, disclosure, alteration, or destruction. In addition, we limit access to Personal Data to those employees, agents, contractors, and other third parties who have a legitimate business need for such access.  In the event your Personal Data is compromised, we will notify you in the most expedient time reasonable under the circumstances and where required by law.
18. Contact Us
Contact us if you have any questions about this Notice or our processing of your Personal Data or want to submit a verifiable consumer request. Please write to the Syndigo privacy team by email at
privacy@syndigo.com
, or call at 1-877-847-5467. Please allow up to four weeks for us to reply.
European Union Representative
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our representative in the EU for data protection matters. While you may also contact us, VeraSafe can be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. To contact VeraSafe, please use this contact form:
https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative/
or via telephone at: +420 228 881 031.
Alternatively, VeraSafe can be contacted at:
VeraSafe Ireland Ltd,
Unit 3D North Point House,
North Point Business Park New Mallow Road Cork T23AT2P
Ireland
United Kingdom Representative
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our representative in the UK for data protection matters. While you may also contact us, VeraSafe can be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. To contact VeraSafe, please use this contact form:
https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative/
or via telephone at
+44 (20) 4532 2003.
Alternatively, VeraSafe can be contacted at:
VeraSafe United Kingdom Ltd.
37 Albert Embankment
London SE1 7TL
United Kingdom
Data Protection Officer
We have appointed
VeraSafe
as our Data Protection Officer (“
DPO
”). While you may contact us directly, VeraSafe can also be contacted on matters related to the processing of Personal Data. VeraSafe’s contact details are:
VeraSafe, LLC
100 M Street S.E., Suite 600
Washington, D.C. 20003
USA
Email:
experts@verasafe.com
Web:
https://www.verasafe.com/about-verasafe/contact-us/
19. Changes to This Notice
If we make any material change to this Notice, we will post the revised Notice to this webpage. We will also update the “Effective” date. By continuing to participate in the Recruitment Process after we post any of these changes, you accept the modified Notice.
German
Français
Polski
Powered by
Localize
English
Sub-policy 2
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 3
https://www.verasafe.com/privacy-services/dispute-resolution/privacy-shield-dispute-procedure/:
Home
Public Resources
Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure
Our Annual IRM Reports
As an Independent Recourse Mechanism (“IRM”) under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, VeraSafe published, and will publish a report as an IRM under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF), each year describing our dispute resolution activities and the state of our IRM and Compliance Verification programs.
2024 Report
2023 Report
2022 Report
2021 Report
2020 Report
2019 Report
2018 Report
2017 Report
1. Introduction
1.1.
The VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework (DPF) Dispute Resolution Procedure (the “Procedure”) is provided and administered by VeraSafe, LLC, (“VeraSafe”), for the resolution of complaints alleging that a Participant in the VeraSafe Privacy Program or VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework (DPF) Dispute Resolution Program (the “Program(s)”), that is also subject to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and as applicable, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S.DPF, and/or the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (together, the “Data Privacy Framework”), the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, U.S.-EU Safe Harbor Framework, or U.S.-Swiss Safe Harbor Framework, has failed to comply with the Framework(s). The Procedure combines facilitation, mediation, and arbitration.
1.2
.
VeraSafe commits to comply with the requirements for independent recourse mechanisms as set forth in Principle 7 “Recourse, Enforcement and Liability” and Supplemental Principle 11 “Dispute Resolution and Enforcement” of the Data Privacy Framework (available at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
), Principle 7 “Recourse, Enforcement and Liability” and Supplemental Principle 11 “Dispute Resolution and Enforcement” of the Privacy Shield Framework, and the Enforcement Principle and FAQ 11 “Dispute Resolution and Enforcement” of the Safe Harbor Frameworks. In case of a conflict between the Procedure and one of the Frameworks, the relevant Framework(s) shall control, and the Procedure shall be modified to the minimum extent necessary in order to permit VeraSafe to comply with its obligations as an independent recourse mechanism under the Framework(s).
1.3.
By participating in the Procedure, the Parties agree to the terms and conditions of the Procedure, as set forth herein.
2. Definitions
2.1.
The following definitions apply to the Procedure:
“Appellate Hearing” means the process described under Section 9 of the Procedure.
“Complainant” means a person who has filed, or attempted to file, a Complaint with VeraSafe under the terms of the Procedure.
“Complaint” means one or more allegation(s) of non-compliance with the Data Privacy Framework, EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, U.S.-EU Safe Harbor Framework, or U.S.-Swiss Safe Harbor Framework filed with VeraSafe under the terms of the Procedure.
“Data Privacy Hearing” means the process described under Section 8 of the Procedure.
“EEA” means the European Economic Area.
“Framework(s)” means the Data Privacy Framework, the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, the Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, the U.S.-EU Safe Harbor Framework, and the U.S.-Swiss Safe Harbor Framework.
“Participant” means a member, in good standing, of the VeraSafe Privacy Program or VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Program.
“Party/Parties” means the Complainant or the Participant, or both, as applicable.
“Procedure Submissions” means all documents, writings, briefs, evidence, and other material, submitted under the Procedure by the Parties or by VeraSafe.
“Settlement Agreement” means an agreement reached by the Parties that resolves the Complaint. To be effective, the terms of such agreement must be recorded in writing and signed by both Parties.
2.2.
Capitalized terms not defined herein shall be understood to have the same meaning as ascribed to such terms in the VeraSafe Privacy Program Certification Criteria set forth at
https://www.verasafe.com/privacy-solutions/privacy-program-certification-criteria/
(such hyperlink may be revised and redirected from time to time).
3. General Terms and Eligibility
3.1. Legal Representation.
One or both Parties may choose to be represented by legal counsel at any stage of the Procedure. If either Party chooses to be represented, that party will notify VeraSafe, providing the name and contact information of the attorney who will be representing the Party. VeraSafe will then notify the other Party of the representation and the attorney’s name and contact information.
3.2. No Payment Required.
The Complainant is not required to pay any remuneration to VeraSafe in order to file a Complaint with the Procedure.
3.3. Eligible Complainant.
For a Complainant to be eligible to file a Complaint, the Complainant must be:
at least thirteen years of age on the date the Complaint is filed under the Procedure and a Data Subject whose PII was exported from the EEA, UK (or Gibraltar), or Switzerland by or to a Participant; or
the parent or legal guardian of a Data Subject (1) who is under eighteen years of age at the time that the Complaint is filed with VeraSafe and (2) whose PII was exported from the EEA, UK (or Gibraltar), or Switzerland by or to a Participant.
3.4. Eligible Complaint.
For a Complaint to be eligible under the Procedure, the Complaint must:
name a Participant that has listed VeraSafe as its independent dispute resolution mechanism on its Data Privacy Framework, EU-U.S. Privacy Shield, Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield, U.S.-EU Safe Harbor, or U.S.-Swiss Safe Harbor self-certification(s) with the U.S. Department of Commerce, as a defendant in the Complaint;
not have been previously resolved or settled by court action, arbitration, or other form of dispute resolution;
be filed using the Procedure for the first time, except for Complaints (1) alleging a Participant’s failure to comply with a previous Settlement Agreement or (2) being amended pursuant to Section 4.3; and
not seek remedies that are not Permitted Outcomes
3.5. Ineligibility Determination.
If, based on the information available to VeraSafe, the Complaint or Complainant is found to be ineligible (an “Ineligibility Determination”), VeraSafe shall close the Complaint, record an outcome of “Ineligible,” and notify the Complainant of the outcome.
3.6. Complainant’s Right to Appeal the Ineligibility Determination.
The Complainant has the right to appeal VeraSafe’s Ineligibility Determination within ten business days of being sent the Ineligibility Determination. If the Complainant can show a reasonable likelihood that VeraSafe made a material error in the Ineligibility Determination, VeraSafe shall duly re-examine the Complaint and make a final determination as to its eligibility. VeraSafe’s determination shall be final after the appeal and no further appeal may be taken.
4. Complaint Filing Procedure
4.1. Prior Good Faith Attempt to Resolve Complaint.
The Complainant must make a good faith effort to resolve his dispute directly with the Participant before filing the Complaint with VeraSafe. Complainants are further encouraged to read the Participant’s applicable privacy notice(s) entirely before filing a Complaint with VeraSafe. If VeraSafe determines, in its sole discretion, that Complainant did not make a good faith effort to resolve the dispute before filing a Complaint, VeraSafe shall require the Complainant to try to resolve the Complaint directly with the Participant and shall advise the Complainant that he or she may re-file the Complaint using the Procedure, as outlined herein, if the attempt to resolve the Complaint with the Participant does not yield satisfactory results.
4.2. Information Required.
A Complainant must provide certain information to VeraSafe in order to successfully file a Complaint with the Procedure. Therefore, the Complaint must:
allege a Participant’s failure to comply with the Framework(s);
include the fullest possible account of facts and events giving rise to the Complaint;
seek one or more of the Permitted Outcomes (see Section 5.1);
if any damages or harm is alleged, include specific details of the harm and/or damages (where applicable, quantification of monetary damages is preferred, but not required);
include valid contact information (mailing address, email address, and contact person) for the Complainant;
include consent to share the Complaint with the Participant;
include all available documentation to support the Complaint;
include a description of Complainant’s good faith effort to resolve the dispute with the Participant, before filing the Complaint; and
include a declaration, under penalty of perjury under the laws of the United States of America, that all information submitted to VeraSafe in the Procedure is true and correct.
4.3. Right to Correct Defective Complaint.
Within ten business days of receiving the Complaint, VeraSafe will inform the Complainant if the Complaint fails to meet any of the requirements enumerated in Section 4.2 and will give the Complainant the opportunity to amend the Complaint to satisfy such requirement(s). As a matter of course, the Complainant will have two opportunities to amend the Complaint for failure to address any defects in the Complaint. Further opportunities to amend the Complaint to satisfy the requirements of Section 4.2 shall be given solely at VeraSafe’s discretion.
4.4. Medium for all Procedure Submissions.
Complaints must be initiated by: (i) submitting VeraSafe’s online complaint form located at:
https://www.verasafe.com/public-resources/dispute-resolution/submit-dispute/
or (ii) by submitting the required information to VeraSafe via email (experts@verasafe.com) and including the following statement: “I represent and warrant that I have read, understand, and agree to be bound by the terms of the VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure”.
VeraSafe shall provide all correspondence to the Parties electronically, either by email or fax.
The Parties shall submit all information, correspondence, and other material required by, or intended for use in, the Procedure (“Procedure Submissions”) to VeraSafe electronically.
Procedure Submissions shall be considered delivered to the recipient immediately upon their electronic transmission by the sender.
5. Permitted Outcomes
5.1.
The
Parties agree that the possible outcomes that a Complainant may seek via the Procedure, and the maximum relief that VeraSafe shall assign in a Data Privacy Hearing or Appellate Hearing during the Procedure, are limited to the non-exclusive remedies described below (the “Permitted Outcomes”). Permitted Outcomes are only those that may
require:
the effects of noncompliance with the Framework(s) to be reversed or corrected by the Participant;
that future data processing by the Participant be in conformity with the Framework(s);
the Participant to cease processing PII of the Complainant;
the Participant to delete relevant PII that was processed contrary to the Framework(s);
the temporary suspension and/or removal of Participant’s license to display VeraSafe Seal(s);
the Participant to compensate the Complainant for actual, direct losses incurred as a result of Participant’s non-compliance with the Framework(s); or
the Participant to comply with any orders set forth by the Hearing Officer or Appeal Officer
5.2.
In order to ensure that any sanctions are sufficiently rigorous – in accordance with Supplemental Principle 11(e)(i) of the Data Privacy Framework – VeraSafe reserves the right to impose additional sanctions upon the Participant that are more severe than those sought by the Complainant in situations where VeraSafe determines that such requested sanctions are inadequate to ensure Participant’s compliance with the Framework(s); provided, however, that the fulfillment of the Complainant’s desired outcome(s) shall be satisfied, at minimum.
6. Complaint Response Procedure
6.1. Participant’s Response to Complaint.
Complaints that VeraSafe determines to be eligible shall be forwarded by VeraSafe to the Participant. The Participant must file its response to the Complaint (“Response”) with VeraSafe within twenty business days of Participant’s receipt of the Complaint from VeraSafe. The Participant’s Response must either:
defend the Participant’s actions as permitted under the applicable Framework(s);
dispute the validity of information presented in the Complaint and contain all available documentation to support the dispute; or
admit fault and agree to remedy the alleged violation(s) as determined by VeraSafe in its sole discretion.
6.2.
Upon VeraSafe’s receipt of the Participant’s Response, VeraSafe will forward it to the Complainant.
6.3. Participant’s Failure to Respond.
If the Participant fails to file a timely Response, the failure to comply with the Procedure will be duly noted in the next Annual Procedure Report (as such term is defined in Section 15 of the Procedure) and VeraSafe shall refer the matter to the appropriate government agency in accordance with Section 14 of the Procedure.
7. Consultative Mediation
7.1. Mediation Teleconference.
If the Complainant is not satisfied by the Participant’s Response to the Complaint, and desires to continue with the Procedure, the Complainant must file with VeraSafe a request for a mediation session to be conducted via telephone (hereinafter, a “Mediation Teleconference”) within ten business days of receiving the Participant’s Response. The Mediation Teleconference is an informal process for the Parties to reexamine the details of the Complaint and work towards a mutually agreeable resolution with the assistance of an approved mediator under the requirements set forth herein.
If the Complainant is satisfied by the Participant’s Response to the Complaint, the Complainant shall notify VeraSafe in writing that the Complaint has been resolved.
If VeraSafe receives notification from the Complainant that the Complainant is satisfied with the Participant’s Response, or otherwise receives no request for a Mediation Teleconference from the Complainant within the timeframe specified in Section 7.1, VeraSafe shall close the Complaint with an outcome of “Closed by Default” and duly notify the Parties.
7.2. Mediation Teleconference Procedure.
VeraSafe will provide and appoint a mediator to lead the Mediation Teleconference with a requisite knowledge of data privacy concepts and the issues involved in the Parties’ dispute to lead the Mediation Teleconference (the “Mediator”). VeraSafe will make a reasonable effort to schedule the teleconference with due regard for the schedules of the Parties and will notify the Parties of the scheduled time and date not less than fifteen business days before the date of the Mediation Teleconference.
Possible Outcomes of the Mediation Teleconference.
Complainant’s Failure to Comply.
If the Complainant fails to appear at the scheduled time of the Mediation Teleconference, it will be assumed that the Participant’s Response has satisfied the Complainant and the Complaint will be closed with an outcome of “Closed by Default” and the Parties duly notified.
Participant’s Failure to Comply.
If the Participant fails to appear at the scheduled time of the Mediation Teleconference, such failure to comply with the Procedure will be duly noted in the next Annual Procedure Report and VeraSafe shall refer the matter to the appropriate regulatory agency in accordance with Section 14.
Mutual Settlement Agreement.
If the Parties reach an agreement during the Mediation Teleconference, VeraSafe will record the terms of the Settlement Agreement (as decided by the Parties) and notify both Parties in writing of those terms within five business days of the Mediation Teleconference.
No Settlement Reached.
If no Settlement Agreement is reached during the Mediation Teleconference, the Complainant must file with VeraSafe a request for a Data Privacy Hearing within ten business days of the Mediation Teleconference or the Complaint will be closed with an outcome of “Closed by Default” and the Parties duly notified.
8. Data Privacy Hearing
8.1. Overview.
Upon the request of the Complainant made to VeraSafe in accordance with the requirements of the Procedure, an officer appointed by VeraSafe (the “Data Privacy Hearing Officer”) will review the Complaint and all Procedure Submissions in a fair and impartial way and determine if the available evidence does, by a preponderance of the evidence, substantiate the alleged violation of the Framework(s) made in the Complaint.
8.2. Exchange of Briefs.
The Complainant’s request for a Data Privacy Hearing should include a detailed brief supporting the allegation(s) in the Complaint (attaching evidence, if appropriate). Upon receipt, VeraSafe will forward the brief to the Participant. The Participant shall provide a brief in rebuttal to VeraSafe (attaching evidence, if appropriate) within ten business days of receiving the Complainant’s brief.
8.3. Data Privacy Hearing Officer.
The Data Privacy Hearing Officer shall: (i) hold a current Certified Information Privacy Professional or Certified Information Privacy Manager credential from the International Association of Privacy Professionals; (ii) hold a Juris Doctor degree from an American Bar Association accredited law school; or (iii) be currently licensed to practice law in a jurisdiction of the United States or an EEA member state.
The Data Privacy Hearing Officer shall be impartial and neutral in the application of the Procedure.
The Data Privacy Hearing Officer shall not be the same individual who served as the Mediator
8.4. Data Privacy Hearing Administration and Procedure.
Data Privacy Hearing Officer’s Request for Information.
The Data Privacy Hearing Officer may request additional information or seek clarification from either Party regarding the Procedure Submissions.
Late Filings and Extensions.
If a Party submits required information after the specified time limits, the untimely information shall not be submitted to the Data Privacy Hearing Officer unless VeraSafe grants an extension for good cause. In lieu of such untimely Procedure Submissions, the Data Privacy Hearing Officer will proceed to use all other available Procedure Submissions in making its Hearing Decision.
Scheduling of Data Privacy Hearing.
VeraSafe will make a reasonable effort to schedule a teleconference for the Data Privacy Hearing with due regard for the schedules of the Parties and will notify the Parties of the scheduled time and date not less than fifteen business days before the date of the teleconference.
Data Privacy Hearing Procedure.
The Parties shall appear telephonically at the hearing, where they will be allowed to present their arguments and evidence (although no new arguments or evidence not contained in the Procedure Submissions will be allowed, unless good cause is shown as to why they were not included). Additionally, the Data Privacy Hearing Officer may ask questions of the Parties about their arguments and evidence.
Hearing Decision and Burden of Proof.
The Data Privacy Hearing Officer shall, based on the Procedure Submissions and Data Privacy Hearing, decide if the available evidence does, by a preponderance of the evidence, substantiate the allegation(s) made in the Complaint and, if so, whether or not the alleged action or inaction of the Participant does violate the Framework(s) (the “Hearing Decision”).
Sustained Complaints.
If, after weighing the arguments and evidence presented in the Procedure Submissions and Data Privacy Hearing, and in due consideration of the totality of the circumstances, the Data Privacy Hearing Officer determines that the available evidence does, by a preponderance of the evidence, substantiate the allegation(s) made in the Complaint, and that the action or inaction of the Participant does violate the Framework(s), the Data Privacy Hearing Officer shall require the Participant to comply with one or more Permitted Outcomes, as appropriate under the circumstances (a “Reparation Order”). The Parties will be duly notified of the Reparation Order.
No Action Taken.
If, after weighing the arguments and evidence presented in the Procedure Submissions and Data Privacy Hearing, and in due consideration of the totality of the circumstances, the Data Privacy Hearing Officer determines that the available evidence does not, by a preponderance of the evidence, substantiate the allegation(s) made in the Complaint, or that the alleged action or inaction of the Participant does not violate the applicable Framework(s), the Complaint shall be closed with an outcome of “Closed – No Action Taken” and the Parties duly notified.
9. Right to Appeal
9.1. Appeal of Data Privacy Hearing Outcome.
Within ten business days of receiving notification that the Complaint has been closed with an outcome of “Closed – No Action Taken,” the Complainant may submit an appeal to VeraSafe, if the Complainant reasonably believes that VeraSafe or the Data Privacy Hearing Officer failed to adhere to the Procedure and such failure materially affected the Hearing Decision.
9.2. Exchange of Briefs.
To be considered, the Complainant’s appeal brief must include a detailed briefing of the alleged failure to adhere to the Procedure, as well as any supporting evidence. Upon receipt of the appeal brief, VeraSafe will forward the appeal brief to the Participant. The Participant must provide a brief in rebuttal (including any supporting evidence) to VeraSafe within ten business days of receiving the Complainant’s appeal brief. The briefs are the “Appellate Procedure Submissions”.
9.3. Appellate Hearing Officer.
VeraSafe will appoint an impartial officer to administer the Appellate Hearing (the “Appellate Hearing Officer”) using the eligibility criteria described in Section 8.3. The Appellate Hearing Officer will not be the same individual who served as the Mediator or the Data Privacy Hearing Officer.
9.4. Appellate Hearing Administration and Procedure.
Consideration of Appeal.
The Appellate Hearing Officer will accept an appeal when the Appellate Procedure Submissions demonstrate that there is a reasonable likelihood that VeraSafe or the Data Privacy Hearing Officer failed to adhere to the Procedure and that such failure materially affected the Hearing Decision. If the Appellate Hearing Officer accepts the appeal, he or she will execute the Appellate Hearing Procedure. If the Appellate Hearing Officer declines to accept the appeal, he or she will provide a written explanation of the decision, which will be provided to Complainant and Participant.
The Appellate Hearing Officer may request additional information or seek clarification from either Party regarding the Appellate Procedure Submissions, either when considering the Appeal or when carrying out the Appellate Hearing Procedure.
Appellate Hearing Procedure.
The Appellate Hearing Officer will duly examine the Appellate Procedure Submissions, as well as the Procedure Submissions, and shall decide if the available evidence does, by a preponderance of the evidence, substantiate the allegation(s) made in the Complaint and, if so, whether or not the alleged action or inaction of the Participant is in violation of the applicable Framework(s) (the “Hearing Decision”).
Sustained Complaints.
If, in due examination of the Appellate Procedure Submissions and Procedure Submissions, and in due consideration of the totality of the circumstances, the Appellate Hearing Officer determines that the available evidence does, by a preponderance of the evidence, substantiate the allegation(s) made in the Complaint, and that the action or inaction of the Participant does violate the applicable Framework(s), the Appellate Hearing officer will issue a Reparation Order requiring the Participant to comply with one or more Permitted Outcomes, as appropriate under the circumstances. The Parties will be duly notified of the Reparation Order.
No Action Taken.
If, in due examination of the Appellate Procedure Submissions and Procedure Submissions, and in due consideration of the totality of the circumstances, the Appellate Hearing officer determines that the available evidence does not, by a preponderance of the evidence, substantiate the allegation(s) made in the Complaint, or that the alleged action or inaction of the Participant does not violate the applicable Framework(s), the Complaint will be closed with an outcome of “Closed – No Action Taken” and the Parties duly notified.
10. Complainant’s Right to Withdraw
10.1.
A Complainant has the right to withdraw its Complaint at any time during the Procedure by submitting to VeraSafe a request to withdraw the Complaint. The Complaint will then be closed with an outcome of “Closed – Withdrawn” and the Parties duly notified.
11. Complainant’s Noncompliance with the Procedure
11.1.
If the Complainant breaches any term(s) of the Procedure in a material way, during any stage of the process, VeraSafe has the right to close the Complaint, record an outcome of “Closed by Default,” and the parties duly notified.
12. Language
12.1.
VeraSafe shall conduct the Procedure in English but insofar as the Complainant is only able to read or write in a language other than English, VeraSafe shall make commercially reasonable efforts to provide translation services to the Complainant as necessary during the Procedure.
13. Participant’s Performance Under a Settlement Agreement or Reparation Order
13.1.
VeraSafe shall monitor the Participant’s compliance with any Settlement Agreements or Reparation Orders entered or issued under the Procedure.
13.2.
When VeraSafe is satisfied with the Participant’s performance regarding an applicable Settlement Agreement or Reparation Order entered or issued under the Procedure, the Complaint will then be closed with an outcome of “Closed by Settlement,” or “Closed by Performance of Reparation Order” and the Parties duly notified.
13.3.
Participant’s Non-Compliance. If Participant fails to comply with a Settlement Agreement or Reparation Order entered or issued under the Procedure, the failure to comply with the Procedure shall be duly noted in the next Annual Procedure Report and VeraSafe shall refer the matter to the relevant government agency pursuant to Section 14.
14. Referral to Government Agencies
14.1.
VeraSafe in its sole discretion, may refer matters to U.S. government regulatory agencies of competent jurisdiction, if:
the Participant refuses to comply with the Procedure in regard to a Complaint that has been filed with VeraSafe, as described in the Procedure; or
VeraSafe determines that the Participant has failed to comply with a Settlement Agreement or Reparation Order entered or issued under the Procedure within a reasonable time.
14.2.
Before referring any matter to a regulatory agency of competent jurisdiction, VeraSafe shall first notify the Participant of the intended referral and give the Participant a reasonable opportunity of at least ten business days to cure any breach of the Framework(s) or any failure to perform its obligations under the Procedure.
14.3.
Reports of referrals to government agencies shall be included in VeraSafe’s Annual Procedure Report.
14.4.
Complaints that VeraSafe refers to a regulatory agency under this Section shall be closed with an outcome of “Closed by Referral to Regulatory Agency,” and the Parties duly notified.
15. Public Reporting
15.1.
VeraSafe shall publish an annual report on the operation of the Procedure (each, an “Annual Procedure Report”). The Annual Procedure Report shall include:
an executive summary, including the period covered in the Annual Procedure Report, the name of the dispute resolution program (the “VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure”) and any highlights from the period;
the number of organizations presently enrolled in the Procedure;
the number of organizations that receive VeraSafe’s Data Privacy Framework verification service, and the number of organizations that receive both the verification service and the dispute resolution service;
a description of how VeraSafe avoids any actual or potential conflicts of interest in situations when it provides an organization with both verification services and dispute resolution services;
a brief description of the types of Data Privacy Framework-related guidance that VeraSafe provides (e.g., online guidance for businesses and consumers, involvement in presentations and other public discussions);
a description of the types of Data Privacy Framework-related compliance activities that VeraSafe engages in (e.g., review methods used by VeraSafe as part of its Data Privacy Framework-related verification service, or other steps that VeraSafe takes to review and/or monitor organizations’ privacy policies);
the requirements for participation in the Program, including the elements of any participation agreement;
a description of how a Complaint can be filed with the Procedure;
a description of the Procedure’s Complaint eligibility requirements and its complaint review process, including how long it takes for Complaints to be processed and resolved and the range of potential remedies; and
statistics for Data Privacy Framework-related complaints during the reporting period, which shall include:
the number Data Privacy Framework-related complaints received during the reporting year;
the types of Data Privacy Framework-related complaints received;
the dispute resolution quality measures for the Data Privacy Framework-related complaints received (e.g., the length of time taken to process those complaints); and
the outcomes of the Data Privacy Framework-related complaints received, notably the number and types of remedies or sanctions imposed.
15.2.
The Annual Procedure Report’s statistical summaries shall be comprised solely of aggregate, anonymous data.
16. Confidentiality
16.1.
Other than the Hearing Decisions and except as noted in Sections 14 and 15, all Procedure Submissions, deliberations, meetings, proceedings, and writings of the Procedure shall be treated as confidential by VeraSafe.
16.2.
Each Party must treat any information provided to them by VeraSafe as confidential and must not make such information available to anyone other than those persons directly involved in the handling of the Complaint, except as allowed or required by applicable law or by the Framework(s).
17. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
17.1.
EXCEPT IN THE CASE OF DELIBERATE WRONGDOING, AND EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT SUCH A LIMITATION OF LIABILITY IS PROHIBITED BY APPLICABLE LAW OR BY THE FRAMEWORK(S), AND WITH THE KNOWLEDGE THAT VERASAFE IS PROVIDING THE PROCEDURE FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE PARTIES INVOLVED, THE PARTIES ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT THE FOLLOWING ARE NOT LIABLE FOR ANY ACT OR OMISSION IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROCEDURE: ANY MEDIATOR, HEARING OFFICER, VERASAFE, NOR ANY VERASAFE EMPLOYEE, BOARD MEMBER, COMPANY OFFICER, OR INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR UTILIZED BY VERASAFE IN THE PROCEDURE
17.2.
VeraSafe can offer no guarantee that the outcome of the Procedure will be an outcome with which either Party, or the Parties, is satisfied.
18. Interpretation
18.1.
This Procedure shall be interpreted under the laws of the United States of America.
19. Waiver of Subpoena
19.1.
Each Party agrees that it will not subpoena any of the following in any legal proceeding arising out of the Procedure or any Complaint: any Mediator, Hearing Officer, VeraSafe, nor any VeraSafe employee, board member, company officer, or independent contractor utilized by VeraSafe in the Procedure.
20. Hold Harmless
20.1.
The Participant agrees to hold VeraSafe, its officers, agents, independent contractors, and employees harmless from any liability, loss, or damage the Participant may suffer as a result of Complaints, claims, demands, costs, Settlement Agreements, Reparation Orders, or judgments against them arising out of the Procedure.
20.2.
The Complainant agrees to hold VeraSafe, its officers, agents and employees harmless from any liability, loss, or damage the Complainant may suffer arising out of the Procedure or the acts or omissions of the Participant that gave rise to the Complaint.
21. Relationship of the Parties
21.1
.
Nothing contained in the Procedure shall be construed to create the relationship of principal and agent, partnership, or joint venture, or any other commercial relationship between VeraSafe and either Party.
21.2.
The Parties have no authority to act as agent for, or on behalf of, VeraSafe, or to represent VeraSafe, or bind VeraSafe in any manner.
22. Contact Information
22.1.
VeraSafe may be contacted using the contact information found at
https://www.verasafe.com/about-us/contact-us/
.
22.2.
The International Trade Administration of the U.S. Department of Commerce may be contacted via the website
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov
and
https://www.export.gov/ITA
.
22.3.
VeraSafe is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. The Commission may be contacted using the information found on the website
https://www.ftc.gov/contact
.
Introduction
Definitions
General Terms and Eligibility
Complaint Filing Procedure
Permitted Outcomes
Complaint Response Procedure
Consultative Mediation
Data Privacy Hearing
Right to Appeal
Complainant’s Right to Withdraw
Complainant’s Noncompliance with the Procedure
Language
Participant’s Performance Under a Settlement Agreement or Reparation Order
Referral to Government Agencies
Public Reporting
Confidentiality
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
Interpretation
Waiver of Subpoena
Hold Harmless
Relationship of the Parties
Contact Information
Track record of successful GDPR implementations across industries.
Work directly with our in-house team of US and European attorneys, IT experts, and project managers.
Strategic, risked-based approach to compliance.
Fully customizable GDPR compliance program, tailored to fit your needs.
Holistic approach: We help you identify business opportunity hidden inside the GDPR.
Going beyond just EU privacy law, VeraSafe is your end-to-end partner for the entire privacy and cybersecurity domain.
Email
info@verasafe.com
Phone
1-617-398-7067
Sub-policy 4
https://www.verasafe.com/privacy-services/dispute-resolution/submit-dispute/:
Home
Public Resources
Submit a dispute
Welcome to the VeraSafe dispute resolution system for all VeraSafe self-regulatory programs, as well as disputes under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF), the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework, U.S.-EU Safe Harbor Framework, and U.S.-Swiss Safe Harbor Framework. If you have a complaint or dispute concerning a participant of our program(s), you can submit the form below. This service is provided at no cost to the general public. VeraSafe will review your complaint and will try to facilitate a resolution. We can only accept complaints that meet our basic eligibility requirements.
When you submit a complaint, you will receive an automatic reply indicating that VeraSafe has received your complaint. We may need to contact you to gather additional information about your complaint. Our investigation typically starts within two business days of receiving your submission.
Additional resources:
VeraSafe Privacy Program Certification Criteria
Terms of the VeraSafe Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution Procedure
Notice: JavaScript is required for this content.
Email
info@verasafe.com
Phone
1-617-398-7067